Illinois, session 104th, HB4766.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 is 5amended by changing Sections 6, 9, 10, 12, 13, 14, 15, 15.3, 616, 19, 20, 24, 26, 27.2, 31.1, and 40 as follows: 7    (230 ILCS 5/6)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-6)8    Sec. 6. Restrictions on Board members. 9    (a) No person shall be appointed a member of the Board or 10continue to be a member of the Board if the person or any 11member of the person's their immediate family is a member of 12the Board of Directors, employee, or financially interested in 13any of the following: (i) any licensee or other person who has 14applied for racing dates to the Board, or the operations 15thereof including, but not limited to, concessions, data 16processing, track maintenance, track security, and pari-mutuel 17operations, located, scheduled or doing business within the 18State of Illinois, (ii) any race horse competing at a meeting 19under the Board's jurisdiction, or (iii) any licensee under 20the Illinois Gambling Act. 21    (b) No person shall be a member of the Board who is not of 22good moral character or who has been convicted of, or is under 23indictment for, a felony under the laws of Illinois or any   HB4766- 2 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1other state, or the United States.2    (c) No member of the Board or employee shall engage in any 3political activity.4    For the purposes of this subsection (c):5    "Political" means any activity in support of or in 6connection with any campaign for State or local elective 7office or any political organization, but does not include 8activities (i) relating to the support or opposition of any 9executive, legislative, or administrative action (as those 10terms are defined in Section 2 of the Lobbyist Registration 11Act), (ii) relating to collective bargaining, or (iii) that 12are otherwise in furtherance of the person's official State 13duties or governmental and public service functions.14    "Political organization" means a party, committee, 15association, fund, or other organization (whether or not 16incorporated) that is required to file a statement of 17organization with the State Board of Elections or county clerk 18under Section 9-3 of the Election Code, but only with regard to 19those activities that require filing with the State Board of 20Elections or county clerk. 21    (d) Board members and employees may not engage in 22communications or any activity that may cause or have the 23appearance of causing a conflict of interest. A conflict of 24interest exists if a situation influences or creates the 25appearance that it may influence judgment or performance of 26regulatory duties and responsibilities. This prohibition shall   HB4766- 3 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1extend to any act identified by Board action that, in the 2judgment of the Board, could represent the potential for or 3the appearance of a conflict of interest.4    (e) Board members and employees may not accept any gift, 5gratuity, service, compensation, travel, lodging, or thing of 6value, with the exception of unsolicited items of an 7incidental nature, from any person, corporation, limited 8liability company, or entity doing business with the Board.9    (f) A Board member or employee shall not use or attempt to 10use the Board member's or employee's his or her official 11position to secure, or attempt to secure, any privilege, 12advantage, favor, or influence for the Board member or 13employee himself or herself or others. No Board member or 14employee, within a period of one year immediately preceding 15nomination by the Governor or employment, shall have been 16employed or received compensation or fees for services from a 17person or entity, or its parent or affiliate, that has engaged 18in business with the Board, a licensee or a licensee under the 19Illinois Gambling Act. In addition, all Board members and 20employees are subject to the restrictions set forth in Section 215-45 of the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act. 22(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 23    (230 ILCS 5/9)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-9)24    Sec. 9. The Board shall have all powers necessary and 25proper to fully and effectively execute the provisions of this   HB4766- 4 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1Act, including, but not limited to, the following:2    (a) The Board is vested with jurisdiction and supervision 3over all race meetings in this State, over all licensees doing 4business in this State, over all occupation licensees, and 5over all persons on the facilities of any licensee. Such 6jurisdiction shall include the power to issue licenses to the 7Illinois Department of Agriculture authorizing the pari-mutuel 8system of wagering on harness and Quarter Horse races held (1) 9at the Illinois State Fair in Sangamon County, and (2) at the 10DuQuoin State Fair in Perry County. The jurisdiction of the 11Board shall also include the power to issue licenses to county 12fairs which are eligible to receive funds pursuant to the 13Agricultural Fair Act, as now or hereafter amended, or their 14agents, authorizing the pari-mutuel system of wagering on 15horse races conducted at the county fairs receiving such 16licenses. Such licenses shall be governed by subsection (n) of 17this Section.18    Upon application, the Board shall issue a license to the 19Illinois Department of Agriculture to conduct harness and 20Quarter Horse races at the Illinois State Fair and at the 21DuQuoin State Fairgrounds during the scheduled dates of each 22fair. The Board shall not require and the Department of 23Agriculture shall be exempt from the requirements of Sections 2415.3, 18 and 19, paragraphs (a)(2), (b), (c), (d), (e), (e-5), 25(e-10), (f), (g), and (h) of Section 20, and Sections 21, 24 26and 25. The Board and the Department of Agriculture may extend   HB4766- 5 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1any or all of these exemptions to any contractor or agent 2engaged by the Department of Agriculture to conduct its race 3meetings when the Board determines that this would best serve 4the public interest and the interest of horse racing.5    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, it 6shall be lawful for any licensee to operate pari-mutuel 7wagering or contract with the Department of Agriculture to 8operate pari-mutuel wagering at the DuQuoin State Fairgrounds 9or for the Department to enter into contracts with a licensee, 10employ its owners, employees or agents and employ such other 11occupation licensees as the Department deems necessary in 12connection with race meetings and wagerings.13    (b) The Board is vested with the full power to promulgate 14reasonable rules and regulations for the purpose of 15administering the provisions of this Act and to prescribe 16reasonable rules, regulations and conditions under which all 17horse race meetings or wagering in the State shall be 18conducted. Such reasonable rules and regulations are to 19provide for the prevention of practices detrimental to the 20public interest and to promote the best interests of horse 21racing and to impose penalties for violations thereof.22    (c) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it 23delegates this power, is vested with the power to enter the 24facilities and other places of business of any licensee to 25determine whether there has been compliance with the 26provisions of this Act and its rules and regulations.  HB4766- 6 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    (d) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it 2delegates this power, is vested with the authority to 3investigate alleged violations of the provisions of this Act, 4its reasonable rules and regulations, orders and final 5decisions; the Board shall take appropriate disciplinary 6action against any licensee or occupation licensee for 7violation thereof or institute appropriate legal action for 8the enforcement thereof.9    (e) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it 10delegates this power, may eject or exclude from any race 11meeting or the facilities of any licensee, or any part 12thereof, any occupation licensee or any other individual whose 13conduct or reputation is such that the individual's his 14presence on those facilities may, in the opinion of the Board, 15call into question the honesty and integrity of horse racing 16or wagering or interfere with the orderly conduct of horse 17racing or wagering; provided, however, that no person shall be 18excluded or ejected from the facilities of any licensee solely 19on the grounds of race, color, creed, national origin, 20ancestry, or sex. The power to eject or exclude an occupation 21licensee or other individual may be exercised for just cause 22by the licensee or the Board, subject to subsequent hearing by 23the Board as to the propriety of said exclusion.24    (f) The Board is vested with the power to acquire, 25establish, maintain and operate (or provide by contract to 26maintain and operate) testing laboratories and related   HB4766- 7 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1facilities, for the purpose of conducting saliva, blood, urine 2and other tests on the horses run or to be run in any horse 3race meeting, including races run at county fairs, and to 4purchase all equipment and supplies deemed necessary or 5desirable in connection with any such testing laboratories and 6related facilities and all such tests.7    (g) The Board may require that the records, including 8financial or other statements of any licensee or any person 9affiliated with the licensee who is involved directly or 10indirectly in the activities of any licensee as regulated 11under this Act to the extent that those financial or other 12statements relate to such activities be kept in such manner as 13prescribed by the Board, and that Board employees shall have 14access to those records during reasonable business hours. 15Within 120 days of the end of its fiscal year, each licensee 16shall transmit to the Board an audit of the financial 17transactions and condition of the licensee's total operations. 18All audits shall be conducted by certified public accountants. 19Each certified public accountant must be registered in the 20State of Illinois under the Illinois Public Accounting Act. 21The compensation for each certified public accountant shall be 22paid directly by the licensee to the certified public 23accountant. A licensee shall also submit any other financial 24or related information the Board deems necessary to 25effectively administer this Act and all rules, regulations, 26and final decisions promulgated under this Act.  HB4766- 8 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    (h) The Board shall name and appoint in the manner 2provided by the rules and regulations of the Board: an 3Executive Director; a State director of mutuels; State 4veterinarians and representatives to take saliva, blood, urine 5and other tests on horses; licensing personnel; revenue 6inspectors; and State seasonal employees (excluding admission 7ticket sellers and mutuel clerks). All of those named and 8appointed as provided in this subsection shall serve during 9the pleasure of the Board; their compensation shall be 10determined by the Board and be paid in the same manner as other 11employees of the Board under this Act.12    (i) The Board shall require that there shall be 3 stewards 13at each horse race meeting, at least 2 of whom shall be named 14and appointed by the Board. Stewards appointed or approved by 15the Board, while performing duties required by this Act or by 16the Board, shall be entitled to the same rights and immunities 17as granted to Board members and Board employees in Section 10 18of this Act.19    (j) The Board may discharge any Board employee who fails 20or refuses for any reason to comply with the rules and 21regulations of the Board, or who, in the opinion of the Board, 22is guilty of fraud, dishonesty or who is proven to be 23incompetent. The Board shall have no right or power to 24determine who shall be officers, directors or employees of any 25licensee, or their salaries except as outlined in Sections 2615.2 and 15.3. The the Board may, by rule, require that all or   HB4766- 9 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1any officials or employees in charge of or whose duties relate 2to the actual running of races be approved by the Board.3    (k) The Board is vested with the power to appoint 4delegates to execute any of the powers granted to it under this 5Section for the purpose of administering this Act and any 6rules or regulations promulgated in accordance with this Act.7    (l) The Board is vested with the power to impose civil 8penalties of up to $5,000 against an individual and up to 9$10,000 against a licensee for each violation of any provision 10of this Act, any rules adopted by the Board, any order of the 11Board or any other action which, in the Board's discretion, is 12a detriment or impediment to horse racing or wagering. 13Beginning on the date when any organization licensee begins 14conducting gaming pursuant to an organization gaming license 15issued under the Illinois Gambling Act, the power granted to 16the Board pursuant to this subsection (l) shall authorize the 17Board to impose penalties of up to $10,000 against an 18individual and up to $25,000 against a licensee. All such 19civil penalties shall be deposited into the Horse Racing Fund. 20    (m) The Board is vested with the power to prescribe a form 21to be used by licensees as an application for employment for 22employees of each licensee.23    (n) The Board shall have the power to issue a license to 24any county fair, or its agent, authorizing the conduct of the 25pari-mutuel system of wagering. The Board is vested with the 26full power to promulgate reasonable rules, regulations and   HB4766- 10 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1conditions under which all horse race meetings licensed 2pursuant to this subsection shall be held and conducted, 3including rules, regulations and conditions for the conduct of 4the pari-mutuel system of wagering. The rules, regulations" 5and conditions shall provide for the prevention of practices 6detrimental to the public interest and for the best interests 7of horse racing, and shall prescribe penalties for violations 8thereof. Any authority granted the Board under this Act shall 9extend to its jurisdiction and supervision over county fairs, 10or their agents, licensed pursuant to this subsection. 11However, the Board may waive any provision of this Act or its 12rules or regulations which would otherwise apply to such 13county fairs or their agents.14    (o) Whenever the Board is authorized or required by law to 15consider some aspect of criminal history record information 16for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 17responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 18conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 19Illinois State Police Law, the Illinois State Police is 20authorized to furnish, pursuant to positive identification, 21such information contained in State files as is necessary to 22fulfill the request.23    (p) To insure the convenience, comfort, and wagering 24accessibility of race track patrons, to provide for the 25maximization of State revenue, and to generate increases in 26purse allotments to the horsemen, the Board shall require any   HB4766- 11 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1licensee to staff the pari-mutuel department with adequate 2personnel. 3(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 4    (230 ILCS 5/10)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-10)5    Sec. 10. Any Board member or Board employee who is subject 6to any civil action arising from any act executed by a Board 7member or the Board employee him while serving as a Board 8member or Board employee shall be represented by the Attorney 9General. All costs of defending such law suit and satisfaction 10of any judgment rendered against a Board member or Board 11employee shall be incurred by the Board. Any Board member or 12Board employee is entitled to the benefit of this Section 13provided the act was committed in good faith.14(Source: P.A. 79-1185.) 15    (230 ILCS 5/12)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-12)16    Sec. 12. (a) Board members shall employ under the 17"Personnel Code", as now or hereafter amended, such 18representatives, accountants, clerks, stenographers, 19inspectors, and other employees as may be necessary. No person 20shall be appointed or hold any office or position under the 21Board who, or any member of whose family, is: 22        (1) an official of, or has any financial or ownership 23    interest in any licensee or occupation licensee engaged in 24    conducting racing within this State, or,   HB4766- 12 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        (2) an owner, trainer, jockey, or harness driver of a 2    horse competing at a race meeting under the jurisdiction 3    of the Board.4    (b) Any employee violating the prohibitions set forth in 5subsection (a) of this Section shall be subject to the 6termination of the employee's his or her employment. If the 7Board determines that an employee is in violation of 8subsection (a) of this Section and should be discharged, it 9must observe the procedures outlined in the "Personnel Code", 10as now or hereafter amended, as they apply to discharge 11proceedings.12    (c) No person employed by the Board during the 12 months 13preceding the effective date of this Act shall be terminated 14from employment due to a violation of the prohibitions set 15forth in subsection (a) of this Section.16(Source: P.A. 89-16, eff. 5-30-95.) 17    (230 ILCS 5/13)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-13)18    Sec. 13. The executive director shall perform any and all 19duties that the Board shall assign the executive director him. 20The salary of the executive director shall be determined by 21the Board and, in addition, the executive director he shall be 22reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses incurred by 23the executive director him in discharge of the executive 24director's his official duties. The executive director shall 25keep records of all proceedings of the Board and shall   HB4766- 13 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1preserve all records, books, documents and other papers 2belonging to the Board or entrusted to its care. The executive 3director shall devote the executive director's his full time 4to the duties of the office and shall not hold any other office 5or employment.6(Source: P.A. 84-531.) 7    (230 ILCS 5/14)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-14)8    Sec. 14. (a) The Board shall hold regular and special 9meetings at such times and places as may be necessary to 10perform properly and effectively all duties required under 11this Act. A majority of the members of the Board shall 12constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business, for 13the performance of any duty, or for the exercise of any power 14which this Act requires the Board members to transact, perform 15or exercise en banc, except that upon order of the Board one of 16the Board members may conduct the hearing provided in Section 1716. The Board member conducting such hearing shall have all 18powers and rights granted to the Board in this Act. The record 19made at the hearing shall be reviewed by the Board, or a 20majority thereof, and the findings and decision of the 21majority of the Board shall constitute the order of the Board 22in such case.23    (b) The Board shall obtain a court reporter who will be 24present at each regular and special meeting and proceeding to 25and who shall make accurate transcriptions thereof or the   HB4766- 14 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1Board shall create a verbatim record of each regular and 2special meeting in the form of an audio or video recording, 3unless, except that when in the judgment of the Board, an 4emergency situation precludes the creation of such transcript 5or recording; in which case, requires a meeting by 6teleconference, the executive director shall prepare minutes 7of the meeting indicating the date and time of the meeting and 8which members of the Board were present or absent, summarizing 9all matters proposed, deliberated, or decided at the meeting, 10and indicating the results of all votes taken. The public 11shall be allowed to listen to the proceedings of that meeting 12at all Board branch offices.13    (c) The Board shall provide records which are separate and 14distinct from the records of any other State board or 15commission. Such records shall be available for public 16inspection and shall accurately reflect all Board proceedings.17    (d) The Board shall file a written annual report with the 18Governor on or before March 1 each year and such additional 19reports as the Governor may request. The annual report shall 20include a statement of receipts and disbursements by the 21Board, actions taken by the Board, a report on the industry's 22progress toward the policy objectives established in Section 231.2 of this Act, and any additional information and 24recommendations which the Board may deem valuable or which the 25Governor may request.26    (e) The Board shall maintain a branch office on the ground   HB4766- 15 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1of every organization licensee during the organization 2licensee's race meeting, which office shall be kept open 3throughout the time the race meeting is held. The Board shall 4designate one of its members, or an authorized agent of the 5Board who shall have the authority to act for the Board, to be 6in charge of the branch office during the time it is required 7to be kept open.8(Source: P.A. 91-40, eff. 6-25-99.) 9    (230 ILCS 5/15)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-15)10    Sec. 15. (a) The Board shall, in its discretion, issue 11occupation licenses to horse owners, trainers, harness 12drivers, jockeys, agents, apprentices, grooms, stable foremen, 13exercise persons, veterinarians, valets, blacksmiths, 14concessionaires and others designated by the Board whose work, 15in whole or in part, is conducted upon facilities within the 16State. Such occupation licenses will be obtained prior to the 17persons engaging in their vocation upon such facilities. The 18Board shall not license pari-mutuel clerks, parking 19attendants, security guards and employees of concessionaires. 20No occupation license shall be required of any person who 21works at facilities within this State as a pari-mutuel clerk, 22parking attendant, security guard or as an employee of a 23concessionaire. Concessionaires of the Illinois State Fair and 24DuQuoin State Fair and employees of the Illinois Department of 25Agriculture shall not be required to obtain an occupation   HB4766- 16 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1license by the Board.2    (b) Each application for an occupation license shall be on 3forms prescribed by the Board. Such license, when issued, 4shall be for the period ending December 31 of each year, except 5that the Board in its discretion may grant 3-year licenses. 6The application shall be accompanied by a fee of not more than 7$25 per year or, in the case of 3-year occupation license 8applications, a fee of not more than $60. Each applicant shall 9set forth in the application the applicant's his full name and 10address, and if the applicant he had been issued prior 11occupation licenses or has been licensed in any other state 12under any other name, such name, the applicant's his age, 13whether or not a permit or license issued to the applicant him 14in any other state has been suspended or revoked and if so 15whether such suspension or revocation is in effect at the time 16of the application, and such other information as the Board 17may require. Fees for registration of stable names shall not 18exceed $50.00. Beginning on the date when any organization 19licensee begins conducting gaming pursuant to an organization 20gaming license issued under the Illinois Gambling Act, the fee 21for registration of stable names shall not exceed $150, and 22the application fee for an occupation license shall not exceed 23$75, per year or, in the case of a 3-year occupation license 24application, the fee shall not exceed $180. 25    (c) The Board may in its discretion refuse an occupation 26license to any person:   HB4766- 17 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        (1) who has been convicted of a crime; 2        (2) who is unqualified to perform the duties required 3    of such applicant; 4        (3) who fails to disclose or states falsely any 5    information called for in the application; 6        (4) who has been found guilty of a violation of this 7    Act or of the rules and regulations of the Board; or 8        (5) whose license or permit has been suspended, 9    revoked or denied for just cause in any other 10    jurisdiction; or state.11        (6) for any other just cause. 12    (d) The Board may suspend or revoke any occupation 13license: 14        (1) for violation of any of the provisions of this 15    Act; or 16        (2) for violation of any of the rules or regulations 17    of the Board; or 18        (3) for any cause which, if known to the Board, would 19    have justified the Board in refusing to issue such 20    occupation license; or 21        (4) for any other just cause.22    (e)   Each applicant shall submit the applicant's his or 23her fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in the form and 24manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 25fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint records 26now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police and   HB4766- 18 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 2databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for 3conducting the criminal history records check, which shall be 4deposited in the State Police Services Fund and shall not 5exceed the actual cost of the records check. The Illinois 6State Police shall furnish, pursuant to positive 7identification, records of conviction to the Board. Each 8applicant for licensure shall submit with the applicant's his 9occupation license application, on forms provided by the 10Board, 2 sets of the applicant's his fingerprints. All such 11applicants shall appear in person at the location designated 12by the Board for the purpose of submitting such sets of 13fingerprints; however, with the prior approval of a State 14steward, an applicant may have such sets of fingerprints taken 15by an official law enforcement agency and submitted to the 16Board.17    (f) The Board may, in its discretion, issue an occupation 18license without submission of fingerprints if an applicant has 19been duly licensed in another recognized racing jurisdiction 20after submitting fingerprints that were subjected to a Federal 21Bureau of Investigation criminal history background check in 22that jurisdiction.23    (g) Beginning on the date when any organization licensee 24begins conducting gaming pursuant to an organization gaming 25license issued under the Illinois Gambling Act, the Board may 26charge each applicant a reasonable nonrefundable fee to defray   HB4766- 19 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1the costs associated with the background investigation 2conducted by the Board. This fee shall be exclusive of any 3other fee or fees charged in connection with an application 4for and, if applicable, the issuance of, an organization 5gaming license. If the costs of the investigation exceed the 6amount of the fee charged, the Board shall immediately notify 7the applicant of the additional amount owed, payment of which 8must be submitted to the Board within 7 days after such 9notification. All information, records, interviews, reports, 10statements, memoranda, or other data supplied to or used by 11the Board in the course of its review or investigation of an 12applicant for a license or renewal under this Act shall be 13privileged, strictly confidential, and shall be used only for 14the purpose of evaluating an applicant for a license or a 15renewal. Such information, records, interviews, reports, 16statements, memoranda, or other data shall not be admissible 17as evidence, nor discoverable, in any action of any kind in any 18court or before any tribunal, board, agency, or person, except 19for any action deemed necessary by the Board. 20(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 21    (230 ILCS 5/15.3)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-15.3)22    Sec. 15.3. Any person who makes application for an 23employment position as a pari-mutuel clerk, parking attendant 24or security guard with a licensee, where such position would 25involve work conducted in whole or in part at a wagering   HB4766- 20 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1facility within this State shall be required to fill out an 2employment application form prescribed by the Illinois Racing 3Board. Such application form shall require the applicant to 4state the following:5    (a) whether the applicant has ever been convicted of a 6felony offense under the laws of this State, the laws of any 7other state, or the laws of the United States;8    (b) whether the applicant has ever been convicted of a 9misdemeanor offense under the laws of this State, the laws of 10any other state, or the laws of the United States, which 11offense involved dishonesty, fraud, deception, or moral 12turpitude, or any of the acts prohibited in Section 15.2;13    (c) whether the applicant has ever been excluded by the 14Board or any other jurisdiction where wagering is conducted;15    (d) whether the applicant has ever committed an act of 16touting, bookmaking, theft, or fraud, as those terms are 17defined in Section 15.2 of this Act; and18    (e) any other information that the Board may deem 19necessary to carry out the purposes of Public Act 84-1468.20    The applicant shall sign the application form and certify 21that, under the penalties of perjury of this State, the 22statements set forth in the application form are true and 23correct.24    The licensee shall, prior to extending an offer of 25employment to the applicant upon its decision to hire the 26applicant, forward a copy of the application form to the Board   HB4766- 21 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1and certify that it has checked the applicant's background and 2it is clear of the acts prohibited in Section 15.2. The Board 3shall review the application form and certification within 5 4business days of receipt immediately upon receipt.5    If The Board's review of the application form shall 6include an inquiry as to whether the applicant has been 7accused of any of the acts prohibited under Section 15.2 of 8this Act and, if the Board finds does find that the applicant 9has been so accused of an act prohibited in Section 15.2, it 10shall conduct an investigation to determine whether, by a 11standard of reasonable certainty, the applicant committed the 12act. If the Board determines that the applicant did commit any 13of the acts prohibited under that Section, it may exclude the 14applicant or declare that the applicant is ineligible for 15employment.16    The Board may declare an applicant ineligible for 17employment if it finds that the applicant has been previously 18excluded by the Board. In making such a declaration, the Board 19shall consider: (a) the reasons the applicant had been 20previously excluded; (b) the period of time that has elapsed 21since the applicant was excluded; and (c) how the previous 22exclusion relates to the applicant's ability to perform the 23duties of the employment position for which he or she is 24applying.25    When the Board excludes an applicant or declares an 26applicant ineligible for employment, it shall immediately   HB4766- 22 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1notify such applicant and the licensee of its action. A person 2so excluded or declared ineligible for employment may request 3a hearing before the Board in accordance with Section 16 of 4this Act.5    No licensee may employ a pari-mutuel clerk, parking 6attendant or security guard at a wagering facility after such 7licensee has been notified that such person has been declared 8ineligible by the Board.9    Nothing herein shall be construed to limit the Board's 10exclusionary authority under Section 16.11    Sections 15.2 and 15.3 of this Act shall apply to any 12person who holds an employment position as a pari-mutuel 13clerk, parking attendant, or security guard subsequent to July 141, 1987 with a licensee. All such employees employed prior to 15July 1, 1987 shall be required to file employment applications 16with the Board, and the information required under 17subparagraphs (a) through (e) of this Section pertaining to 18conduct or activities prior to July 1, 1987 shall only be used 19by the Board in its determination to exclude an applicant or 20its declaration that an applicant is ineligible for employment 21based on conduct that occurs after July 1, 1987.22(Source: P.A. 89-16, eff. 5-30-95.) 23    (230 ILCS 5/16)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-16)24    Sec. 16. (a) The Board shall, in accordance with Section 2515, have the power to revoke or suspend an occupation license,   HB4766- 23 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1and the steward or judges at a race meeting shall have the 2power to suspend an occupation license of any horse owner, 3trainer, harness driver, jockey, agent, apprentice, groom, 4stable foreman, exercise boy, veterinarian, valet, blacksmith 5or concessionaire whose work, in whole or in part, is 6conducted at facilities within the State, or to determine the 7eligibility for employment at a wagering facility of a 8pari-mutuel clerk, parking attendant or security guard. The 9Illinois Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to the 10actions of the Board or of the stewards or judges at a race 11meeting, and those actions shall instead be subject to the 12procedures outlined in subsections (b) through (e) of this 13Section.14    The Board may refuse to issue or may suspend the 15occupation license of any person who fails to file a return, or 16to pay the tax, penalty or interest shown in a filed return, or 17to pay any final assessment of tax, penalty or interest, as 18required by any tax Act administered by the Illinois 19Department of Revenue, until such time as the requirements of 20any such tax Act are satisfied.21    (b) In the event the Board, for violation of the 22provisions of this Act or the rules and regulations of the 23Board or other just cause, refuses, revokes or suspends an 24occupation license, or a steward or the judges at any race 25meeting suspend an occupation license of any horse owner, 26trainer, harness driver, jockey, agent, apprentice, groom,   HB4766- 24 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1stable foreman, exercise person, veterinarian, valet, 2blacksmith, concessionaire or other occupation licensee whose 3work, in whole or in part is conducted at facilities within the 4State and owned by a licensee, or declare a person ineligible 5for employment, then the occupation license of the person or 6his eligibility for employment shall be suspended pending a 7hearing of the Board.8    (c) The person affected by such action at any race meeting 9may request a hearing before the Board within 5 regular 10business days after receipt of notice of the suspension from 11the Board, the steward or the judges at any race meeting. The 12hearing shall be held by the Board within 7 regular business 13days after such request has been received by the Board. Any 14action of a steward or the judges with respect to any 15occupation license or eligibility for employment may be heard 16by the Board on its own motion by giving the aggrieved party at 17least 3 days' notice in writing of the time and place of the 18hearing.19    (d) All hearings by the Board under this Section shall be 20held at such place in the State as the Board may designate and 21any notice provided for shall be served by mailing it postage 22prepaid by certified mail to the parties affected. Any such 23notice so mailed is deemed to have been served on the business 24day next following the date of such mailing.25    (e) The Board in conducting such hearings shall not be 26bound by technical rules of evidence, but all evidence offered   HB4766- 25 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1before the Board shall be reduced to writing and shall, with 2petition and exhibits, if any, and the findings of the Board, 3be permanently preserved and constitute the record of the 4Board in such case. The Board may require that appellants bear 5reasonable costs of the production of hearing transcripts. Any 6of the parties affected in such hearing may be represented by 7counsel and introduce evidence. At the request of the Board, 8the Attorney General shall assist and participate in the 9conduct of such hearing.10    (f) Every member of the Board has the power to administer 11oaths and affirmations, certify all official acts, issue 12subpoenas, compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses 13and the production of papers, books, accounts, and documents.14    (g) Any person who is served with a subpoena (issued by the 15Board or any member thereof) to appear and testify, or to 16produce books, papers, accounts or documents in the course of 17an inquiry or hearing conducted under this Act, and who 18refuses or neglects to appear or to testify or to produce 19books, papers, accounts and documents relative to the hearings 20as commanded in such subpoenas, may be punished by the Circuit 21Court in the county where the violation is committed in the 22same manner as the Circuit Court may punish such refusal or 23neglect in a case filed in court.24    (h) In case of disobedience to a subpoena, the Board may 25petition the Circuit Court in the county where the violation 26was committed for an order requiring the attendance and   HB4766- 26 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1testimony of witnesses or the production of documentary 2evidence or both. A copy of such petition shall be served by 3personal notice or by registered or certified mail upon the 4person who has failed to obey that subpoena, and such person 5shall be advised in writing that a hearing upon the petition 6will be requested in a court room to be designated in that 7notice before the judge occupying the courtroom on a specified 8date and at a specified time.9    (i) The court, upon the filing of such a petition, may 10order the person refusing to obey the subpoena to appear 11before the Board at a designated time, or to there produce 12documentary evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence 13relating to the subject matter of the hearing. Any failure to 14obey such order of the Circuit Court may be punished by that 15court as a civil or criminal contempt upon itself.16    (j) The Board, any member thereof or any applicant may, in 17connection with any hearing before the Board, cause the 18deposition of witnesses within or without the State to be 19taken on oral or written interrogatories in the manner 20prescribed for depositions in the courts of this State.21    (k) At the conclusion of such hearing, the Board shall 22make its findings which shall be the basis of the refusal, 23suspension or revocation of the occupation license or other 24action taken by the Board. Such findings and the action of the 25Board shall be final. However, the action of the Board and the 26propriety thereof are subject to review under Section 46.  HB4766- 27 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1(Source: P.A. 89-16, eff. 5-30-95.) 2    (230 ILCS 5/19)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-19)3    Sec. 19. (a) No organization license may be granted to 4conduct a horse race meeting:5        (1) except as provided in subsection (c) of Section 21 6    of this Act, to any person at any place within 35 miles of 7    any other place licensed by the Board to hold a race 8    meeting on the same date during the same hours, the 9    mileage measurement used in this subsection (a) shall be 10    certified to the Board by the Bureau of Systems and 11    Services in the Illinois Department of Transportation as 12    the most commonly used public way of vehicular travel;13        (2) to any person in default in the payment of any 14    obligation or debt due the State under this Act, provided 15    no applicant shall be deemed in default in the payment of 16    any obligation or debt due to the State under this Act as 17    long as there is pending a hearing of any kind relevant to 18    such matter;19        (3) to any person who has been convicted of the 20    violation of any law of the United States or any State law 21    which provided as all or part of its penalty imprisonment 22    in any penal institution; to any person against whom there 23    is pending a Federal or State criminal charge; to any 24    person who is or has been connected with or engaged in the 25    operation of any illegal business; to any person who does   HB4766- 28 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    not enjoy a general reputation in the person's his 2    community of being an honest, upright, law-abiding person; 3    provided that none of the matters set forth in this 4    subparagraph (3) shall make any person ineligible to be 5    granted an organization license if the Board determines, 6    based on circumstances of any such case, that the granting 7    of a license would not be detrimental to the interests of 8    horse racing and of the public;9        (4) to any person who does not at the time of 10    application for the organization license own or have a 11    contract or lease for the possession of a finished race 12    track suitable for the type of racing intended to be held 13    by the applicant and for the accommodation of the public 14    or have plans certified by a licensed architect and 15    confirmed financing for construction of a race track 16    suitable for the type of racing intended to be held by the 17    applicant and for the accommodation of the public on 18    property that the applicant owns or has a contract or 19    lease for possession of with completion scheduled before 20    the meet applied for begins.21    (b) (Blank).22    (c) If any person is ineligible to receive an organization 23license because of any of the matters set forth in subsection 24(a) (2) or subsection (a) (3) of this Section, any other or 25separate person that either (i) controls, directly or 26indirectly, such ineligible person or (ii) is controlled,   HB4766- 29 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1directly or indirectly, by such ineligible person or by a 2person which controls, directly or indirectly, such ineligible 3person shall also be ineligible.4(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 5    (230 ILCS 5/20)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-20)6    Sec. 20. (a) Any person desiring to conduct a horse race 7meeting may apply to the Board for an organization license. 8The application shall be made on a form prescribed and 9furnished by the Board. The application shall specify: 10        (1) the dates on which it intends to conduct the horse 11    race meeting, which dates shall be provided under Section 12    21; 13        (2) the hours of each racing day between which it 14    intends to hold or conduct horse racing at such meeting; 15        (3) the location where it proposes to conduct the 16    meeting; and 17        (4) any other information the Board may reasonably 18    require.19    (b) A separate application for an organization license 20shall be filed for each horse race meeting which such person 21proposes to hold. Any such application, if made by an 22individual, or by any individual as trustee, shall be signed 23and verified under oath by such individual. If the application 24is made by individuals, then it shall be signed and verified 25under oath by at least 2 of the individuals; if the application   HB4766- 30 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1is made by a partnership, an association, a corporation, a 2corporate trustee, a limited liability company, or any other 3entity, it shall be signed by an authorized officer, a 4partner, a member, or a manager, as the case may be, of the 5entity.6    (c) The application shall specify: 7        (1) the name of the persons, association, trust, or 8    corporation making such application; 9        (2) the principal address of the applicant; 10        (3) if the applicant is a trustee, the names and 11    addresses of the beneficiaries; if the applicant is a 12    corporation, the names and addresses of all officers, 13    stockholders and directors; or if such stockholders hold 14    stock as a nominee or fiduciary, the names and addresses 15    of the parties who are the beneficial owners thereof or 16    who are beneficially interested therein; if the applicant 17    is a partnership, the names and addresses of all partners, 18    general or limited; if the applicant is a limited 19    liability company, the names and addresses of the manager 20    and members; and if the applicant is any other entity, the 21    names and addresses of all officers or other authorized 22    persons of the entity.23    (d) The applicant shall execute and file with the Board a 24good faith affirmative action plan to recruit, train, and 25upgrade minorities in all classifications within the 26association.  HB4766- 31 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    (e) With such application there shall be delivered to the 2Board a certified check or bank draft payable to the order of 3the Board for an amount equal to $10,000 $1,000. All 4applications for the issuance of an organization license shall 5be filed with the Board before August 1 of the year prior to 6the year for which application is made and shall be acted upon 7by the Board at a meeting to be held on such date as shall be 8fixed by the Board during the last 15 days of September of such 9prior year. At such meeting, the Board shall announce the 10award of the racing meets, live racing schedule, and 11designation of host track to the applicants and its approval 12or disapproval of each application. No announcement shall be 13considered binding until a formal order is executed by the 14Board, which shall be executed no later than October 15 of that 15prior year. Absent the agreement of the affected organization 16licensees, the Board shall not grant overlapping race meetings 17to 2 or more tracks that are within 100 miles of each other to 18conduct the thoroughbred racing.19    (e-1) The Board shall award standardbred racing dates to 20organization licensees with an organization gaming license 21pursuant to the following schedule:22        (1) For the first calendar year of operation of 23    gambling games by an organization gaming licensee under 24    this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, when a 25    single entity requests standardbred racing dates, the 26    Board shall award no fewer than 100 days of racing. The   HB4766- 32 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    100-day requirement may be reduced to no fewer than 80 2    days if no dates are requested for the first 3 months of a 3    calendar year. If more than one entity requests 4    standardbred racing dates, the Board shall award no fewer 5    than 140 days of racing between the applicants.6        (2) For the second calendar year of operation of 7    gambling games by an organization gaming licensee under 8    this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, when a 9    single entity requests standardbred racing dates, the 10    Board shall award no fewer than 100 days of racing. The 11    100-day requirement may be reduced to no fewer than 80 12    days if no dates are requested for the first 3 months of a 13    calendar year. If more than one entity requests 14    standardbred racing dates, the Board shall award no fewer 15    than 160 days of racing between the applicants.16        (3) For the third calendar year of operation of 17    gambling games by an organization gaming licensee under 18    this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, and 19    each calendar year thereafter, when a single entity 20    requests standardbred racing dates, the Board shall award 21    no fewer than 120 days of racing. The 120-day requirement 22    may be reduced to no fewer than 100 days if no dates are 23    requested for the first 3 months of a calendar year. If 24    more than one entity requests standardbred racing dates, 25    the Board shall award no fewer than 200 days of racing 26    between the applicants.  HB4766- 33 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    An organization licensee shall apply for racing dates 2pursuant to this subsection (e-1). In awarding racing dates 3under this subsection (e-1), the Board shall have the 4discretion to allocate those standardbred racing dates among 5these organization licensees.6    (e-2) The Board shall award thoroughbred racing days to 7Cook County organization licensees pursuant to the following 8schedule:9        (1) During the first year in which only one 10    organization licensee is awarded an organization gaming 11    license, the Board shall award no fewer than 110 days of 12    racing.13        During the second year in which only one organization 14    licensee is awarded an organization gaming license, the 15    Board shall award no fewer than 115 racing days.16        During the third year and every year thereafter, in 17    which only one organization licensee is awarded an 18    organization gaming license, the Board shall award no 19    fewer than 120 racing days.20        (2) During the first year in which 2 organization 21    licensees are awarded an organization gaming license, the 22    Board shall award no fewer than 139 total racing days.23        During the second year in which 2 organization 24    licensees are awarded an organization gaming license, the 25    Board shall award no fewer than 160 total racing days.26        During the third year and every year thereafter in   HB4766- 34 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    which 2 organization licensees are awarded an organization 2    gaming license, the Board shall award no fewer than 174 3    total racing days.4    A Cook County organization licensee shall apply for racing 5dates pursuant to this subsection (e-2). In awarding racing 6dates under this subsection (e-2), the Board shall have the 7discretion to allocate those thoroughbred racing dates among 8these Cook County organization licensees.9    (e-3) In awarding racing dates for calendar year 2020 and 10thereafter in connection with a racetrack in Madison County, 11the Board shall award racing dates and such organization 12licensee shall run at least 700 thoroughbred races at the 13racetrack in Madison County each year. 14    Notwithstanding Section 7.7 of the Illinois Gambling Act 15or any provision of this Act other than subsection (e-4.5), 16for each calendar year for which an organization gaming 17licensee located in Madison County requests racing dates 18resulting in less than 700 live thoroughbred races at its 19racetrack facility, the organization gaming licensee may not 20conduct gaming pursuant to an organization gaming license 21issued under the Illinois Gambling Act for the calendar year 22of such requested live races. 23    (e-4) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 7.7 of the 24Illinois Gambling Act or any provision of this Act other than 25subsections (e-3) and (e-4.5), for each calendar year for 26which an organization gaming licensee requests thoroughbred   HB4766- 35 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1racing dates which results in a number of live races under its 2organization license that is less than the total number of 3live races which it conducted in 2017 at its racetrack 4facility, the organization gaming licensee may not conduct 5gaming pursuant to its organization gaming license for the 6calendar year of such requested live races. 7    (e-4.1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 7.7 of 8the Illinois Gambling Act or any provision of this Act other 9than subsections (e-3) and (e-4.5), for each calendar year for 10which an organization licensee requests racing dates for 11standardbred racing which results in a number of live races 12that is less than the total number of live races required in 13subsection (e-1), the organization gaming licensee may not 14conduct gaming pursuant to its organization gaming license for 15the calendar year of such requested live races. 16    (e-4.5) The Board shall award the minimum live racing 17guarantees contained in subsections (e-1), (e-2), and (e-3) to 18ensure that each organization licensee shall individually run 19a sufficient number of races per year to qualify for an 20organization gaming license under this Act. The General 21Assembly finds that the minimum live racing guarantees 22contained in subsections (e-1), (e-2), and (e-3) are in the 23best interest of the sport of horse racing, and that such 24guarantees may only be reduced in the calendar year in which 25they will be conducted in the limited circumstances described 26in this subsection. The Board may decrease the number of   HB4766- 36 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1racing days without affecting an organization licensee's 2ability to conduct gaming pursuant to an organization gaming 3license issued under the Illinois Gambling Act only if the 4Board determines, after notice and hearing, that: 5        (i) a decrease is necessary to maintain a sufficient 6    number of betting interests per race to ensure the 7    integrity of racing; 8        (ii) there are unsafe track conditions due to weather 9    or acts of God;10        (iii) there is an agreement between an organization 11    licensee and the breed association that is applicable to 12    the involved live racing guarantee, such association 13    representing either the largest number of thoroughbred 14    owners and trainers or the largest number of standardbred 15    owners, trainers and drivers who race horses at the 16    involved organization licensee's racing meeting, so long 17    as the agreement does not compromise the integrity of the 18    sport of horse racing; or19        (iv) the horse population or purse levels are 20    insufficient to provide the number of racing opportunities 21    otherwise required in this Act. 22    In decreasing the number of racing dates in accordance 23with this subsection, the Board shall hold a hearing and shall 24provide the public and all interested parties notice and an 25opportunity to be heard. The Board shall accept testimony from 26all interested parties, including any association representing   HB4766- 37 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1owners, trainers, jockeys, or drivers who will be affected by 2the decrease in racing dates. The Board shall provide a 3written explanation of the reasons for the decrease and the 4Board's findings. The written explanation shall include a 5listing and content of all communication between any party and 6any Illinois Racing Board member or staff that does not take 7place at a public meeting of the Board. 8    (e-5) In reviewing an application for the purpose of 9granting an organization license consistent with the best 10interests of the public and the sport of horse racing, the 11Board shall consider: 12        (1) the character, reputation, experience, and 13    financial integrity of the applicant and of any other 14    separate person that either: 15            (i) controls the applicant, directly or 16        indirectly, or 17            (ii) is controlled, directly or indirectly, by 18        that applicant or by a person who controls, directly 19        or indirectly, that applicant; 20        (2) the applicant's facilities or proposed facilities 21    for conducting horse racing; 22        (3) the total revenue without regard to Section 32.1 23    to be derived by the State and horsemen from the 24    applicant's conducting a race meeting; 25        (4) the applicant's good faith affirmative action plan 26    to recruit, train, and upgrade minorities in all   HB4766- 38 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    employment classifications; 2        (5) the applicant's financial ability to purchase and 3    maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance; 4        (6) the applicant's proposed and prior year's 5    promotional and marketing activities and expenditures of 6    the applicant associated with those activities; 7        (7) an agreement, if any, among organization licensees 8    as provided in subsection (b) of Section 21 of this Act; 9    and 10        (8) the extent to which the applicant exceeds or meets 11    other standards for the issuance of an organization 12    license that the Board shall adopt by rule.13    In granting organization licenses and allocating dates for 14horse race meetings, the Board shall have discretion to 15determine an overall schedule, including required simulcasts 16of Illinois races by host tracks that will, in its judgment, be 17conducive to the best interests of the public and the sport of 18horse racing.19    (e-10) The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act shall 20apply to administrative procedures of the Board under this Act 21for the granting of an organization license, except that (1) 22notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of Section 2310-40 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act regarding 24cross-examination, the Board may prescribe rules limiting the 25right of an applicant or participant in any proceeding to 26award an organization license to conduct cross-examination of   HB4766- 39 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1witnesses at that proceeding where that cross-examination 2would unduly obstruct the timely award of an organization 3license under subsection (e) of Section 20 of this Act; (2) the 4provisions of Section 10-45 of the Illinois Administrative 5Procedure Act regarding proposals for decision are excluded 6under this Act; (3) notwithstanding the provisions of 7subsection (a) of Section 10-60 of the Illinois Administrative 8Procedure Act regarding ex parte communications, the Board may 9prescribe rules allowing ex parte communications with 10applicants or participants in a proceeding to award an 11organization license where conducting those communications 12would be in the best interest of racing, provided all those 13communications are made part of the record of that proceeding 14pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 10-60 of the Illinois 15Administrative Procedure Act; (4) the provisions of Section 1614a of this Act and the rules of the Board promulgated under 17that Section shall apply instead of the provisions of Article 1810 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act regarding 19administrative law judges; and (5) the provisions of 20subsection (d) of Section 10-65 of the Illinois Administrative 21Procedure Act that prevent summary suspension of a license 22pending revocation or other action shall not apply.23    (f) The Board may allot racing dates to an organization 24licensee for more than one calendar year but for no more than 3 25successive calendar years in advance, provided that the Board 26shall review such allotment for more than one calendar year   HB4766- 40 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1prior to each year for which such allotment has been made. The 2granting of an organization license to a person constitutes a 3privilege to conduct a horse race meeting under the provisions 4of this Act, and no person granted an organization license 5shall be deemed to have a vested interest, property right, or 6future expectation to receive an organization license in any 7subsequent year as a result of the granting of an organization 8license. Organization licenses shall be subject to revocation 9if the organization licensee has violated any provision of 10this Act or the rules and regulations promulgated under this 11Act or has been convicted of a crime or has failed to disclose 12or has stated falsely any information called for in the 13application for an organization license. Any organization 14license revocation proceeding shall be in accordance with 15Section 16 regarding suspension and revocation of occupation 16licenses.17    (f-5) If, (i) an applicant does not file an acceptance of 18the racing dates awarded by the Board as required under part 19(1) of subsection (h) of this Section 20, or (ii) an 20organization licensee has its license suspended or revoked 21under this Act, or (iii) an organization licensee surrenders 22its license, the Board, upon conducting an emergency hearing 23as provided for in this Act, may reaward on an emergency basis 24pursuant to rules established by the Board, racing dates not 25accepted, or the racing dates associated with any suspension 26or revocation period, or the racing dates following the   HB4766- 41 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1surrender of an organization license to one or more 2organization licensees, new applicants, or any combination 3thereof, upon terms and conditions that the Board determines 4are in the best interest of racing, provided, the organization 5licensees or new applicants receiving the awarded racing dates 6file an acceptance of those reawarded racing dates as required 7under paragraph (1) of subsection (h) of this Section 20 and 8comply with the other provisions of this Act. The Illinois 9Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to the 10administrative procedures of the Board in conducting the 11emergency hearing and the reallocation of racing dates on an 12emergency basis.13    (g) (Blank).14    (h) The Board shall send the applicant a copy of its 15formally executed order by certified mail addressed to the 16applicant at the address stated in the applicant's his 17application, which notice shall be mailed within 5 days of the 18date the formal order is executed.19    Each applicant notified shall, within 10 days after 20receipt of the final executed order of the Board awarding 21racing dates: 22        (1) file with the Board an acceptance of such award in 23    the form prescribed by the Board; 24        (2) pay to the Board an additional amount equal to 25    $110 for each racing date awarded; and 26        (3) file with the Board the bonds required in Sections   HB4766- 42 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    21 and 25 at least 20 days prior to the first day of each 2    race meeting.3Upon compliance with the provisions of paragraphs (1), (2), 4and (3) of this subsection (h), the applicant shall be issued 5an organization license.6    If any applicant fails to comply with this Section or 7fails to pay the organization license fees herein provided, no 8organization license shall be issued to such applicant.9(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 10    (230 ILCS 5/24)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-24)11    Sec. 24. (a) No license shall be issued to or held by an 12organization licensee unless all of its officers, directors, 13and holders of ownership interests of at least 5% are first 14approved by the Board. The Board shall not give approval of an 15organization license application to any person who has been 16convicted of or is under an indictment for a crime of moral 17turpitude or has violated any provision of the racing law of 18this State or any rules of the Board. 19    (b) An organization licensee must notify the Board within 2010 days of any change in the holders of a direct or indirect 21interest in the ownership of the organization licensee. The 22Board may, after hearing, revoke the organization license of 23any person who registers on its books or knowingly permits a 24direct or indirect interest in the ownership of that person 25without notifying the Board of the name of the holder in   HB4766- 43 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1interest within this period.2    (c) In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of 3this Section, no person shall be granted an organization 4license if any public official of the State or member of the 5public official's his or her family holds any ownership or 6financial interest, directly or indirectly, in the person.7    (d) No person which has been granted an organization 8license to hold a race meeting shall give to any public 9official or member of the public official's his family, 10directly or indirectly, for or without consideration, any 11interest in the person. The Board shall, after hearing, revoke 12the organization license granted to a person which has 13violated this subsection.14    (e) (Blank).15    (f) No organization licensee or concessionaire or officer, 16director or holder or controller of 5% or more legal or 17beneficial interest in any organization licensee or concession 18shall make any sort of gift or contribution that is prohibited 19under Article 10 of the State Officials and Employees Ethics 20Act or pay or give any money or other thing of value to any 21person who is a public official, or a candidate or nominee for 22public office if that payment or gift is prohibited under 23Article 10 of the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act.24(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 25    (230 ILCS 5/26)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-26)  HB4766- 44 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    Sec. 26. Wagering. 2    (a) Any licensee may conduct and supervise the pari-mutuel 3system of wagering, as defined in Section 3.12 of this Act, on 4horse races conducted by an Illinois organization licensee or 5conducted at a racetrack located in another state or country 6in accordance with subsection (g) of Section 26 of this Act. 7Subject to the prior consent of the Board, licensees may 8supplement any pari-mutuel pool in order to guarantee a 9minimum distribution. Such pari-mutuel method of wagering 10shall not, under any circumstances if conducted under the 11provisions of this Act, be held or construed to be unlawful, 12other statutes of this State to the contrary notwithstanding. 13Subject to rules for advance wagering promulgated by the 14Board, any licensee may accept wagers in advance of the day the 15race wagered upon occurs.16    (b) Except for those gaming activities for which a license 17is obtained and authorized under the Illinois Lottery Law, the 18Charitable Games Act, the Raffles and Poker Runs Act, or the 19Illinois Gambling Act, no other method of betting, pool 20making, wagering or gambling shall be used or permitted by the 21licensee. Each licensee may retain, subject to the payment of 22all applicable taxes and purses, an amount not to exceed 17% of 23all money wagered under subsection (a) of this Section, except 24as may otherwise be permitted under this Act.25    (b-5) An individual may place a wager under the 26pari-mutuel system from any licensed location authorized under   HB4766- 45 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1this Act provided that wager is electronically recorded in the 2manner described in Section 3.12 of this Act. Any wager made 3electronically by an individual while physically on the 4premises of a licensee shall be deemed to have been made at the 5premises of that licensee.6    (c) (Blank).7    (c-5) The sum held by any licensee for payment of 8outstanding pari-mutuel tickets, if unclaimed prior to 9December 31 of the next year, shall be retained by the licensee 10for payment of such tickets until that date. Within 10 days 11thereafter, the balance of such sum remaining unclaimed, less 12any uncashed supplements contributed by such licensee for the 13purpose of guaranteeing minimum distributions of any 14pari-mutuel pool, shall be evenly distributed to the purse 15account of the organization licensee and the organization 16licensee, except that the balance of the sum of all 17outstanding pari-mutuel tickets generated from simulcast 18wagering and inter-track wagering by an organization licensee 19located in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and 20borders the Mississippi River or any licensee that derives its 21license from that organization licensee shall be evenly 22distributed to the purse account of the organization licensee 23and the organization licensee.24    (d) A pari-mutuel ticket shall be honored until December 2531 of the next calendar year, and the licensee shall pay the 26same and may charge the amount thereof against unpaid money   HB4766- 46 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1similarly accumulated on account of pari-mutuel tickets not 2presented for payment.3    (e) No licensee shall knowingly permit any minor, other 4than an employee of such licensee or an owner, trainer, 5jockey, driver, or employee thereof, to be admitted during a 6racing program unless accompanied by a parent or guardian, or 7any minor to be a patron of the pari-mutuel system of wagering 8conducted or supervised by it. The admission of any 9unaccompanied minor, other than an employee of the licensee or 10an owner, trainer, jockey, driver, or employee thereof at a 11race track is a Class C misdemeanor.12    (f) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Act, an 13organization licensee may contract with an entity in another 14state or country to permit any legal wagering entity in 15another state or country to accept wagers solely within such 16other state or country on races conducted by the organization 17licensee in this State. Beginning January 1, 2000, these 18wagers shall not be subject to State taxation. Until January 191, 2000, when the out-of-State entity conducts a pari-mutuel 20pool separate from the organization licensee, a privilege tax 21equal to 7 1/2% of all monies received by the organization 22licensee from entities in other states or countries pursuant 23to such contracts is imposed on the organization licensee, and 24such privilege tax shall be remitted to the Department of 25Revenue within 48 hours of receipt of the moneys from the 26simulcast. When the out-of-State entity conducts a combined   HB4766- 47 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1pari-mutuel pool with the organization licensee, the tax shall 2be 10% of all monies received by the organization licensee 3with 25% of the receipts from this 10% tax to be distributed to 4the county in which the race was conducted.5    An organization licensee may permit one or more of its 6races to be utilized for pari-mutuel wagering at one or more 7locations in other states and may transmit audio and visual 8signals of races the organization licensee conducts to one or 9more locations outside the State or country and may also 10permit pari-mutuel pools in other states or countries to be 11combined with its gross or net wagering pools or with wagering 12pools established by other states.13    (g) A host track may accept interstate simulcast wagers on 14horse races conducted in other states or countries and shall 15control the number of signals and types of breeds of racing in 16its simulcast program, subject to the disapproval of the 17Board. The Board may prohibit a simulcast program only if it 18finds that the simulcast program is clearly adverse to the 19integrity of racing. The host track simulcast program shall 20include the signal of live racing of all organization 21licensees. All non-host licensees and advance deposit wagering 22licensees shall carry the signal of and accept wagers on live 23racing of all organization licensees. Advance deposit wagering 24licensees shall not be permitted to accept out-of-state wagers 25on any Illinois signal provided pursuant to this Section 26without the approval and consent of the organization licensee   HB4766- 48 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1providing the signal. For one year after August 15, 2014 (the 2effective date of Public Act 98-968), non-host licensees may 3carry the host track simulcast program and shall accept wagers 4on all races included as part of the simulcast program of horse 5races conducted at race tracks located within North America 6upon which wagering is permitted. For a period of one year 7after August 15, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 898-968), on horse races conducted at race tracks located 9outside of North America, non-host licensees may accept wagers 10on all races included as part of the simulcast program upon 11which wagering is permitted. Beginning August 15, 2015 (one 12year after the effective date of Public Act 98-968), non-host 13licensees may carry the host track simulcast program and shall 14accept wagers on all races included as part of the simulcast 15program upon which wagering is permitted. All organization 16licensees shall provide their live signal to all advance 17deposit wagering licensees for a simulcast commission fee not 18to exceed 6% of the advance deposit wagering licensee's 19Illinois handle on the organization licensee's signal without 20prior approval by the Board. The Board may adopt rules under 21which it may permit simulcast commission fees in excess of 6%. 22The Board shall adopt rules limiting the interstate commission 23fees charged to an advance deposit wagering licensee. The 24Board shall adopt rules regarding advance deposit wagering on 25interstate simulcast races that shall reflect, among other 26things, the General Assembly's desire to maximize revenues to   HB4766- 49 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1the State, horsemen purses, and organization licensees. 2However, organization licensees providing live signals 3pursuant to the requirements of this subsection (g) may 4petition the Board to withhold their live signals from an 5advance deposit wagering licensee if the organization licensee 6discovers and the Board finds reputable or credible 7information that the advance deposit wagering licensee is 8under investigation by another state or federal governmental 9agency, the advance deposit wagering licensee's license has 10been suspended in another state, or the advance deposit 11wagering licensee's license is in revocation proceedings in 12another state. The organization licensee's provision of their 13live signal to an advance deposit wagering licensee under this 14subsection (g) pertains to wagers placed from within Illinois. 15Advance deposit wagering licensees may place advance deposit 16wagering terminals at wagering facilities as a convenience to 17customers. The advance deposit wagering licensee shall not 18charge or collect any fee from purses for the placement of the 19advance deposit wagering terminals. The costs and expenses of 20the host track and non-host licensees associated with 21interstate simulcast wagering, other than the interstate 22commission fee, shall be borne by the host track and all 23non-host licensees incurring these costs. The interstate 24commission fee shall not exceed 5% of Illinois handle on the 25interstate simulcast race or races without prior approval of 26the Board. The Board shall promulgate rules under which it may   HB4766- 50 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1permit interstate commission fees in excess of 5%. The 2interstate commission fee and other fees charged by the 3sending racetrack, including, but not limited to, satellite 4decoder fees, shall be uniformly applied to the host track and 5all non-host licensees.6    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, an 7organization licensee, with the consent of the horsemen 8association representing the largest number of owners, 9trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race horses at 10that organization licensee's racing meeting, may maintain a 11system whereby advance deposit wagering may take place or an 12organization licensee, with the consent of the horsemen 13association representing the largest number of owners, 14trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race horses at 15that organization licensee's racing meeting, may contract with 16another person to carry out a system of advance deposit 17wagering. Such consent may not be unreasonably withheld. Only 18with respect to an appeal to the Board that consent for an 19organization licensee that maintains its own advance deposit 20wagering system is being unreasonably withheld, the Board 21shall issue a final order within 30 days after initiation of 22the appeal, and the organization licensee's advance deposit 23wagering system may remain operational during that 30-day 24period. The actions of any organization licensee who conducts 25advance deposit wagering or any person who has a contract with 26an organization licensee to conduct advance deposit wagering   HB4766- 51 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1who conducts advance deposit wagering on or after January 1, 22013 and prior to June 7, 2013 (the effective date of Public 3Act 98-18) taken in reliance on the changes made to this 4subsection (g) by Public Act 98-18 are hereby validated, 5provided payment of all applicable pari-mutuel taxes are 6remitted to the Board. All advance deposit wagers placed from 7within Illinois must be placed through a Board-approved 8advance deposit wagering licensee; no other entity may accept 9an advance deposit wager from a person within Illinois. All 10advance deposit wagering is subject to any rules adopted by 11the Board. The Board may adopt rules necessary to regulate 12advance deposit wagering through the use of emergency 13rulemaking in accordance with Section 5-45 of the Illinois 14Administrative Procedure Act. The General Assembly finds that 15the adoption of rules to regulate advance deposit wagering is 16deemed an emergency and necessary for the public interest, 17safety, and welfare. An advance deposit wagering licensee may 18retain all moneys as agreed to by contract with an 19organization licensee. Any moneys retained by the organization 20licensee from advance deposit wagering, not including moneys 21retained by the advance deposit wagering licensee, shall be 22paid 50% to the organization licensee's purse account and 50% 23to the organization licensee. With the exception of any 24organization licensee that is owned by a publicly traded 25company that is incorporated in a state other than Illinois 26and advance deposit wagering licensees under contract with   HB4766- 52 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1such organization licensees, organization licensees that 2maintain advance deposit wagering systems and advance deposit 3wagering licensees that contract with organization licensees 4shall provide sufficiently detailed monthly accountings to the 5horsemen association representing the largest number of 6owners, trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race 7horses at that organization licensee's racing meeting so that 8the horsemen association, as an interested party, can confirm 9the accuracy of the amounts paid to the purse account at the 10horsemen association's affiliated organization licensee from 11advance deposit wagering. If more than one breed races at the 12same race track facility, then the 50% of the moneys to be paid 13to an organization licensee's purse account shall be allocated 14among all organization licensees' purse accounts operating at 15that race track facility proportionately based on the actual 16number of host days that the Board grants to that breed at that 17race track facility in the current calendar year. To the 18extent any fees from advance deposit wagering conducted in 19Illinois for wagers in Illinois or other states have been 20placed in escrow or otherwise withheld from wagers pending a 21determination of the legality of advance deposit wagering, no 22action shall be brought to declare such wagers or the 23disbursement of any fees previously escrowed illegal.24        (1) Between the hours of 6:30 a.m. and 6:30 p.m. an 25    inter-track wagering licensee other than the host track 26    may supplement the host track simulcast program with   HB4766- 53 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    additional simulcast races or race programs, provided that 2    between January 1 and the third Friday in February of any 3    year, inclusive, if no live thoroughbred racing is 4    occurring in Illinois during this period, only 5    thoroughbred races may be used for supplemental interstate 6    simulcast purposes. The Board shall withhold approval for 7    a supplemental interstate simulcast only if it finds that 8    the simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of 9    racing. A supplemental interstate simulcast may be 10    transmitted from an inter-track wagering licensee to its 11    affiliated non-host licensees. The interstate commission 12    fee for a supplemental interstate simulcast shall be paid 13    by the non-host licensee and its affiliated non-host 14    licensees receiving the simulcast.15        (2) Between the hours of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m. an 16    inter-track wagering licensee other than the host track 17    may receive supplemental interstate simulcasts only with 18    the consent of the host track, except when the Board finds 19    that the simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of 20    racing. Consent granted under this paragraph (2) to any 21    inter-track wagering licensee shall be deemed consent to 22    all non-host licensees. The interstate commission fee for 23    the supplemental interstate simulcast shall be paid by all 24    participating non-host licensees.25        (3) Each licensee conducting interstate simulcast 26    wagering may retain, subject to the payment of all   HB4766- 54 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    applicable taxes and the purses, an amount not to exceed 2    17% of all money wagered. If any licensee conducts the 3    pari-mutuel system wagering on races conducted at 4    racetracks in another state or country, each such race or 5    race program shall be considered a separate racing day for 6    the purpose of determining the daily handle and computing 7    the privilege tax of that daily handle as provided in 8    subsection (a) of Section 27. Until January 1, 2000, from 9    the sums permitted to be retained pursuant to this 10    subsection, each inter-track wagering location licensee 11    shall pay 1% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered on 12    simulcast wagering to the Horse Racing Tax Allocation 13    Fund, subject to the provisions of subparagraph (B) of 14    paragraph (11) of subsection (h) of Section 26 of this 15    Act.16        (4) A licensee who receives an interstate simulcast 17    may combine its gross or net pools with pools at the 18    sending racetracks pursuant to rules established by the 19    Board. All licensees combining their gross pools at a 20    sending racetrack shall adopt the takeout percentages of 21    the sending racetrack. A licensee may also establish a 22    separate pool and takeout structure for wagering purposes 23    on races conducted at race tracks outside of the State of 24    Illinois. The licensee may permit pari-mutuel wagers 25    placed in other states or countries to be combined with 26    its gross or net wagering pools or other wagering pools.  HB4766- 55 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        (5) After the payment of the interstate commission fee 2    (except for the interstate commission fee on a 3    supplemental interstate simulcast, which shall be paid by 4    the host track and by each non-host licensee through the 5    host track) and all applicable State and local taxes, 6    except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 27 of this 7    Act, the remainder of moneys retained from simulcast 8    wagering pursuant to this subsection (g), and Section 26.2 9    shall be divided as follows:10            (A) For interstate simulcast wagers made at a host 11        track, 50% to the host track and 50% to purses at the 12        host track.13            (B) For wagers placed on interstate simulcast 14        races, supplemental simulcasts as defined in 15        subparagraphs (1) and (2), and separately pooled races 16        conducted outside of the State of Illinois made at a 17        non-host licensee, 25% to the host track, 25% to the 18        non-host licensee, and 50% to the purses at the host 19        track.20        (6) Notwithstanding any provision in this Act to the 21    contrary, non-host licensees who derive their licenses 22    from a track located in a county with a population in 23    excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River 24    may receive supplemental interstate simulcast races at all 25    times subject to Board approval, which shall be withheld 26    only upon a finding that a supplemental interstate   HB4766- 56 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of racing.2        (7) Effective January 1, 2017, notwithstanding any 3    provision of this Act to the contrary, after payment of 4    all applicable State and local taxes and interstate 5    commission fees, non-host licensees who derive their 6    licenses from a track located in a county with a 7    population in excess of 230,000 and that borders the 8    Mississippi River shall retain 50% of the retention from 9    interstate simulcast wagers and shall pay 50% to purses at 10    the track from which the non-host licensee derives its 11    license.12        (7.1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act 13    to the contrary, if no standardbred racing is conducted at 14    a racetrack located in Madison County during any calendar 15    year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, and the 16    licensee that conducts horse racing at that racetrack 17    requests from the Board at least as many racing dates as 18    were conducted in calendar year 2000, all moneys derived 19    by that racetrack from simulcast wagering and inter-track 20    wagering that (1) are to be used for purses and (2) are 21    generated between the hours of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m. 22    during that calendar year shall be paid as follows:23            (A) Eighty percent shall be paid to its 24        thoroughbred purse account; and25            (B) Twenty percent shall be deposited into the 26        Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund and shall   HB4766- 57 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        be paid to purses for standardbred races for Illinois 2        conceived and foaled horses conducted at any county 3        fairgrounds. The moneys deposited into the Fund 4        pursuant to this subparagraph (B) shall be deposited 5        within 2 weeks after the day they were generated, 6        shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other 7        moneys paid to standardbred purses under this Act, and 8        shall not be commingled with other moneys paid into 9        that Fund. The moneys deposited pursuant to this 10        subparagraph (B) shall be allocated as provided by the 11        Department of Agriculture, with the advice and 12        assistance of the Illinois Standardbred Breeders Fund 13        Advisory Board.14        (7.2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act 15    to the contrary, if no thoroughbred racing is conducted at 16    a racetrack located in Madison County during any calendar 17    year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, and the 18    licensee that conducts horse racing at that racetrack 19    requests from the Board at least as many racing dates as 20    were conducted in calendar year 2000, all moneys derived 21    by that racetrack from simulcast wagering and inter-track 22    wagering that (1) are to be used for purses and (2) are 23    generated between the hours of 6:30 a.m. and 6:30 p.m. 24    during that calendar year shall be deposited as follows:25            (A) Eighty percent shall be deposited into its 26        standardbred purse account; and  HB4766- 58 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1            (B) Twenty percent shall be deposited into the 2        Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund. Moneys 3        deposited into the Illinois Colt Stakes Purse 4        Distribution Fund pursuant to this subparagraph (B) 5        shall be paid to Illinois conceived and foaled 6        thoroughbred breeders' programs and to thoroughbred 7        purses for races conducted at any county fairgrounds 8        for Illinois conceived and foaled horses at the 9        discretion of the Department of Agriculture, with the 10        advice and assistance of the Illinois Thoroughbred 11        Breeders Fund Advisory Board. The moneys deposited 12        into the Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund 13        pursuant to this subparagraph (B) shall be deposited 14        within 2 weeks after the day they were generated, 15        shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other 16        moneys paid to thoroughbred purses under this Act, and 17        shall not be commingled with other moneys deposited 18        into that Fund.19        (8) Notwithstanding any provision in this Act to the 20    contrary, an organization licensee from a track located in 21    a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and that 22    borders the Mississippi River and its affiliated non-host 23    licensees shall not be entitled to share in any retention 24    generated on racing, inter-track wagering, or simulcast 25    wagering at any other Illinois wagering facility.26        (8.1) Notwithstanding any provisions in this Act to   HB4766- 59 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    the contrary, if 2 organization licensees are conducting 2    standardbred race meetings concurrently between the hours 3    of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m., after payment of all 4    applicable State and local taxes and interstate commission 5    fees, the remainder of the amount retained from simulcast 6    wagering otherwise attributable to the host track and to 7    host track purses shall be split daily between the 2 8    organization licensees and the purses at the tracks of the 9    2 organization licensees, respectively, based on each 10    organization licensee's share of the total live handle for 11    that day, provided that this provision shall not apply to 12    any non-host licensee that derives its license from a 13    track located in a county with a population in excess of 14    230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River.15        (9) (Blank).16        (10) (Blank).17        (11) (Blank).18        (12) The Board shall have authority to compel all host 19    tracks to receive the simulcast of any or all races 20    conducted at the Springfield or DuQuoin State fairgrounds 21    and include all such races as part of their simulcast 22    programs.23        (13) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 24    in the event that the total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 25    Illinois horse races at all wagering facilities in any 26    calendar year is less than 75% of the total Illinois   HB4766- 60 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    pari-mutuel handle on Illinois horse races at all such 2    wagering facilities for calendar year 1994, then each 3    wagering facility that has an annual total Illinois 4    pari-mutuel handle on Illinois horse races that is less 5    than 75% of the total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 6    Illinois horse races at such wagering facility for 7    calendar year 1994, shall be permitted to receive, from 8    any amount otherwise payable to the purse account at the 9    race track with which the wagering facility is affiliated 10    in the succeeding calendar year, an amount equal to 2% of 11    the differential in total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 12    Illinois horse races at the wagering facility between that 13    calendar year in question and 1994 provided, however, that 14    a wagering facility shall not be entitled to any such 15    payment until the Board certifies in writing to the 16    wagering facility the amount to which the wagering 17    facility is entitled and a schedule for payment of the 18    amount to the wagering facility, based on: (i) the racing 19    dates awarded to the race track affiliated with the 20    wagering facility during the succeeding year; (ii) the 21    sums available or anticipated to be available in the purse 22    account of the race track affiliated with the wagering 23    facility for purses during the succeeding year; and (iii) 24    the need to ensure reasonable purse levels during the 25    payment period. The Board's certification shall be 26    provided no later than January 31 of the succeeding year.   HB4766- 61 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    In the event a wagering facility entitled to a payment 2    under this paragraph (13) is affiliated with a race track 3    that maintains purse accounts for both standardbred and 4    thoroughbred racing, the amount to be paid to the wagering 5    facility shall be divided between each purse account pro 6    rata, based on the amount of Illinois handle on Illinois 7    standardbred and thoroughbred racing respectively at the 8    wagering facility during the previous calendar year. 9    Annually, the General Assembly shall appropriate 10    sufficient funds from the General Revenue Fund to the 11    Department of Agriculture for payment into the 12    thoroughbred and standardbred horse racing purse accounts 13    at Illinois pari-mutuel tracks. The amount paid to each 14    purse account shall be the amount certified by the 15    Illinois Racing Board in January to be transferred from 16    each account to each eligible racing facility in 17    accordance with the provisions of this Section. Beginning 18    in the calendar year in which an organization licensee 19    that is eligible to receive payment under this paragraph 20    (13) begins to receive funds from gaming pursuant to an 21    organization gaming license issued under the Illinois 22    Gambling Act, the amount of the payment due to all 23    wagering facilities licensed under that organization 24    licensee under this paragraph (13) shall be the amount 25    certified by the Board in January of that year. An 26    organization licensee and its related wagering facilities   HB4766- 62 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    shall no longer be able to receive payments under this 2    paragraph (13) beginning in the year subsequent to the 3    first year in which the organization licensee begins to 4    receive funds from gaming pursuant to an organization 5    gaming license issued under the Illinois Gambling Act.6    (h) The Board may approve and license the conduct of 7inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering by inter-track 8wagering licensees and inter-track wagering location licensees 9subject to the following terms and conditions:10        (1) Any person licensed to conduct a race meeting (i) 11    at a track where 60 or more days of racing were conducted 12    during the immediately preceding calendar year or where 13    over the 5 immediately preceding calendar years an average 14    of 30 or more days of racing were conducted annually may be 15    issued an inter-track wagering license; (ii) at a track 16    located in a county that is bounded by the Mississippi 17    River, which has a population of less than 150,000 18    according to the 1990 decennial census, and an average of 19    at least 60 days of racing per year between 1985 and 1993 20    may be issued an inter-track wagering license; (iii) at a 21    track awarded standardbred racing dates; or (iv) at a 22    track located in Madison County that conducted at least 23    100 days of live racing during the immediately preceding 24    calendar year may be issued an inter-track wagering 25    license, unless a lesser schedule of live racing is the 26    result of (A) weather, unsafe track conditions, or other   HB4766- 63 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    acts of God; (B) an agreement between the organization 2    licensee and the associations representing the largest 3    number of owners, trainers, jockeys, or standardbred 4    drivers who race horses at that organization licensee's 5    racing meeting; or (C) a finding by the Board of 6    extraordinary circumstances and that it was in the best 7    interest of the public and the sport to conduct fewer than 8    100 days of live racing. Any such person having operating 9    control of the racing facility may receive inter-track 10    wagering location licenses. An eligible race track located 11    in a county that has a population of more than 230,000 and 12    that is bounded by the Mississippi River may establish up 13    to 9 inter-track wagering locations, an eligible race 14    track located in Stickney Township in Cook County may 15    establish up to 16 inter-track wagering locations, and an 16    eligible race track located in Palatine Township in Cook 17    County may establish up to 18 inter-track wagering 18    locations. An eligible racetrack conducting standardbred 19    racing may have up to 16 inter-track wagering locations. 20    An application for said license shall be filed with the 21    Board prior to such dates as may be fixed by the Board. 22    With an application for an inter-track wagering location 23    license there shall be delivered to the Board a certified 24    check or bank draft payable to the order of the Board for 25    an amount equal to $500. The application shall be on forms 26    prescribed and furnished by the Board. The application   HB4766- 64 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    shall comply with all other rules, regulations and 2    conditions imposed by the Board in connection therewith.3        (2) The Board shall examine the applications with 4    respect to their conformity with this Act and the rules 5    and regulations imposed by the Board. If found to be in 6    compliance with the Act and rules and regulations of the 7    Board, the Board may then issue a license to conduct 8    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering to such 9    applicant. All such applications shall be acted upon by 10    the Board at a meeting to be held on such date as may be 11    fixed by the Board.12        (3) In granting licenses to conduct inter-track 13    wagering and simulcast wagering, the Board shall give due 14    consideration to the best interests of the public, of 15    horse racing, and of maximizing revenue to the State.16        (4) Prior to the issuance of a license to conduct 17    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering, the applicant 18    shall file with the Board a bond payable to the State of 19    Illinois in the sum of $50,000, executed by the applicant 20    and a surety company or companies authorized to do 21    business in this State, and conditioned upon (i) the 22    payment by the licensee of all taxes due under Section 27 23    or 27.1 and any other monies due and payable under this 24    Act, and (ii) distribution by the licensee, upon 25    presentation of the winning ticket or tickets, of all sums 26    payable to the patrons of pari-mutuel pools.  HB4766- 65 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        (5) Each license to conduct inter-track wagering and 2    simulcast wagering shall specify the person to whom it is 3    issued, the dates on which such wagering is permitted, and 4    the track or location where the wagering is to be 5    conducted.6        (6) All wagering under such license is subject to this 7    Act and to the rules and regulations from time to time 8    prescribed by the Board, and every such license issued by 9    the Board shall contain a recital to that effect.10        (7) An inter-track wagering licensee or inter-track 11    wagering location licensee may accept wagers at the track 12    or location where it is licensed, or as otherwise provided 13    under this Act.14        (8) Inter-track wagering or simulcast wagering shall 15    not be conducted at any track less than 4 miles from a 16    track at which a racing meeting is in progress.17        (8.1) Inter-track wagering location licensees who 18    derive their licenses from a particular organization 19    licensee shall conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast 20    wagering only at locations that are within 160 miles of 21    that race track where the particular organization licensee 22    is licensed to conduct racing. However, inter-track 23    wagering and simulcast wagering shall not be conducted by 24    those licensees at any location within 5 miles of any race 25    track at which a horse race meeting has been licensed in 26    the current year, unless the person having operating   HB4766- 66 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    control of such race track has given its written consent 2    to such inter-track wagering location licensees, which 3    consent must be filed with the Board at or prior to the 4    time application is made. In the case of any inter-track 5    wagering location licensee initially licensed after 6    December 31, 2013, inter-track wagering and simulcast 7    wagering shall not be conducted by those inter-track 8    wagering location licensees that are located outside the 9    City of Chicago at any location within 8 miles of any race 10    track at which a horse race meeting has been licensed in 11    the current year, unless the person having operating 12    control of such race track has given its written consent 13    to such inter-track wagering location licensees, which 14    consent must be filed with the Board at or prior to the 15    time application is made. 16        (8.2) Inter-track wagering or simulcast wagering shall 17    not be conducted by an inter-track wagering location 18    licensee at any location within 100 feet of an existing 19    church, an existing elementary or secondary public school, 20    or an existing elementary or secondary private school 21    registered with or recognized by the State Board of 22    Education. The distance of 100 feet shall be measured to 23    the nearest part of any building used for worship 24    services, education programs, or conducting inter-track 25    wagering by an inter-track wagering location licensee, and 26    not to property boundaries. However, inter-track wagering   HB4766- 67 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    or simulcast wagering may be conducted at a site within 2    100 feet of a church or school if such church or school has 3    been erected or established after the Board issues the 4    original inter-track wagering location license at the site 5    in question. Inter-track wagering location licensees may 6    conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering only 7    in areas that are zoned for commercial or manufacturing 8    purposes or in areas for which a special use has been 9    approved by the local zoning authority. However, no 10    license to conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast 11    wagering shall be granted by the Board with respect to any 12    inter-track wagering location within the jurisdiction of 13    any local zoning authority which has, by ordinance or by 14    resolution, prohibited the establishment of an inter-track 15    wagering location within its jurisdiction. However, 16    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering may be 17    conducted at a site if such ordinance or resolution is 18    enacted after the Board licenses the original inter-track 19    wagering location licensee for the site in question.20        (9) (Blank).21        (10) An inter-track wagering licensee or an 22    inter-track wagering location licensee may retain, subject 23    to the payment of the privilege taxes and the purses, an 24    amount not to exceed 17% of all money wagered. Each 25    program of racing conducted by each inter-track wagering 26    licensee or inter-track wagering location licensee shall   HB4766- 68 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    be considered a separate racing day for the purpose of 2    determining the daily handle and computing the privilege 3    tax or pari-mutuel tax on such daily handle as provided in 4    Section 27.5        (10.1) Except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 6    27 of this Act, inter-track wagering location licensees 7    shall pay 1% of the pari-mutuel handle at each location to 8    the municipality in which such location is situated and 1% 9    of the pari-mutuel handle at each location to the county 10    in which such location is situated. In the event that an 11    inter-track wagering location licensee is situated in an 12    unincorporated area of a county, such licensee shall pay 13    2% of the pari-mutuel handle from such location to such 14    county. Inter-track wagering location licensees must pay 15    the handle percentage required under this paragraph to the 16    municipality and county no later than the 20th of the 17    month following the month such handle was generated.18        (10.2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 19    Act, with respect to inter-track wagering at a race track 20    located in a county that has a population of more than 21    230,000 and that is bounded by the Mississippi River ("the 22    first race track"), or at a facility operated by an 23    inter-track wagering licensee or inter-track wagering 24    location licensee that derives its license from the 25    organization licensee that operates the first race track, 26    on races conducted at the first race track or on races   HB4766- 69 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    conducted at another Illinois race track and 2    simultaneously televised to the first race track or to a 3    facility operated by an inter-track wagering licensee or 4    inter-track wagering location licensee that derives its 5    license from the organization licensee that operates the 6    first race track, those moneys shall be allocated as 7    follows:8            (A) That portion of all moneys wagered on 9        standardbred racing that is required under this Act to 10        be paid to purses shall be paid to purses for 11        standardbred races.12            (B) That portion of all moneys wagered on 13        thoroughbred racing that is required under this Act to 14        be paid to purses shall be paid to purses for 15        thoroughbred races.16        (11) (A) After payment of the privilege or pari-mutuel 17    tax, any other applicable taxes, and the costs and 18    expenses in connection with the gathering, transmission, 19    and dissemination of all data necessary to the conduct of 20    inter-track wagering, the remainder of the monies retained 21    under either Section 26 or Section 26.2 of this Act by the 22    inter-track wagering licensee on inter-track wagering 23    shall be allocated with 50% to be split between the 2 24    participating licensees and 50% to purses, except that an 25    inter-track wagering licensee that derives its license 26    from a track located in a county with a population in   HB4766- 70 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River 2    shall not divide any remaining retention with the Illinois 3    organization licensee that provides the race or races, and 4    an inter-track wagering licensee that accepts wagers on 5    races conducted by an organization licensee that conducts 6    a race meet in a county with a population in excess of 7    230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River shall not 8    divide any remaining retention with that organization 9    licensee.10        (B) From the sums permitted to be retained pursuant to 11    this Act each inter-track wagering location licensee shall 12    pay (i) the privilege or pari-mutuel tax to the State; 13    (ii) 4.75% of the pari-mutuel handle on inter-track 14    wagering at such location on races as purses, except that 15    an inter-track wagering location licensee that derives its 16    license from a track located in a county with a population 17    in excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi 18    River shall retain all purse moneys for its own purse 19    account consistent with distribution set forth in this 20    subsection (h), and inter-track wagering location 21    licensees that accept wagers on races conducted by an 22    organization licensee located in a county with a 23    population in excess of 230,000 and that borders the 24    Mississippi River shall distribute all purse moneys to 25    purses at the operating host track; (iii) until January 1, 26    2000, except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 27   HB4766- 71 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    of this Act, 1% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered on 2    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering at each 3    inter-track wagering location licensee facility to the 4    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund, provided that, to the 5    extent the total amount collected and distributed to the 6    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund under this subsection (h) 7    during any calendar year exceeds the amount collected and 8    distributed to the Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund during 9    calendar year 1994, that excess amount shall be 10    redistributed (I) to all inter-track wagering location 11    licensees, based on each licensee's pro rata share of the 12    total handle from inter-track wagering and simulcast 13    wagering for all inter-track wagering location licensees 14    during the calendar year in which this provision is 15    applicable; then (II) the amounts redistributed to each 16    inter-track wagering location licensee as described in 17    subpart (I) shall be further redistributed as provided in 18    subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subsection (g) of 19    this Section 26 provided first, that the shares of those 20    amounts, which are to be redistributed to the host track 21    or to purses at the host track under subparagraph (B) of 22    paragraph (5) of subsection (g) of this Section 26 shall 23    be redistributed based on each host track's pro rata share 24    of the total inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering 25    handle at all host tracks during the calendar year in 26    question, and second, that any amounts redistributed as   HB4766- 72 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    described in part (I) to an inter-track wagering location 2    licensee that accepts wagers on races conducted by an 3    organization licensee that conducts a race meet in a 4    county with a population in excess of 230,000 and that 5    borders the Mississippi River shall be further 6    redistributed, effective January 1, 2017, as provided in 7    paragraph (7) of subsection (g) of this Section 26, with 8    the portion of that further redistribution allocated to 9    purses at that organization licensee to be divided between 10    standardbred purses and thoroughbred purses based on the 11    amounts otherwise allocated to purses at that organization 12    licensee during the calendar year in question; and (iv) 8% 13    of the pari-mutuel handle on inter-track wagering wagered 14    at such location to satisfy all costs and expenses of 15    conducting its wagering. The remainder of the monies 16    retained by the inter-track wagering location licensee 17    shall be allocated 40% to the location licensee and 60% to 18    the organization licensee which provides the Illinois 19    races to the location, except that an inter-track wagering 20    location licensee that derives its license from a track 21    located in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 22    and that borders the Mississippi River shall not divide 23    any remaining retention with the organization licensee 24    that provides the race or races and an inter-track 25    wagering location licensee that accepts wagers on races 26    conducted by an organization licensee that conducts a race   HB4766- 73 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    meet in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and 2    that borders the Mississippi River shall not divide any 3    remaining retention with the organization licensee. 4    Notwithstanding the provisions of clauses (ii) and (iv) of 5    this paragraph, in the case of the additional inter-track 6    wagering location licenses authorized under paragraph (1) 7    of this subsection (h) by Public Act 87-110, those 8    licensees shall pay the following amounts as purses: 9    during the first 12 months the licensee is in operation, 10    5.25% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered at the location on 11    races; during the second 12 months, 5.25%; during the 12    third 12 months, 5.75%; during the fourth 12 months, 13    6.25%; and during the fifth 12 months and thereafter, 14    6.75%. The following amounts shall be retained by the 15    licensee to satisfy all costs and expenses of conducting 16    its wagering: during the first 12 months the licensee is 17    in operation, 8.25% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered at 18    the location; during the second 12 months, 8.25%; during 19    the third 12 months, 7.75%; during the fourth 12 months, 20    7.25%; and during the fifth 12 months and thereafter, 21    6.75%. For additional inter-track wagering location 22    licensees authorized under Public Act 89-16, purses for 23    the first 12 months the licensee is in operation shall be 24    5.75% of the pari-mutuel wagered at the location, purses 25    for the second 12 months the licensee is in operation 26    shall be 6.25%, and purses thereafter shall be 6.75%. For   HB4766- 74 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    additional inter-track location licensees authorized under 2    Public Act 89-16, the licensee shall be allowed to retain 3    to satisfy all costs and expenses: 7.75% of the 4    pari-mutuel handle wagered at the location during its 5    first 12 months of operation, 7.25% during its second 12 6    months of operation, and 6.75% thereafter.7        (C) There is hereby created the Horse Racing Tax 8    Allocation Fund which shall remain in existence until 9    December 31, 1999. Moneys remaining in the Fund after 10    December 31, 1999 shall be paid into the General Revenue 11    Fund. Until January 1, 2000, all monies paid into the 12    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund pursuant to this 13    paragraph (11) by inter-track wagering location licensees 14    located in park districts of 500,000 population or less, 15    or in a municipality that is not included within any park 16    district but is included within a conservation district 17    and is the county seat of a county that (i) is contiguous 18    to the state of Indiana and (ii) has a 1990 population of 19    88,257 according to the United States Bureau of the 20    Census, and operating on May 1, 1994 shall be allocated by 21    appropriation as follows:22            Two-sevenths to the Department of Agriculture. 23        Fifty percent of this two-sevenths shall be used to 24        promote the Illinois horse racing and breeding 25        industry, and shall be distributed by the Department 26        of Agriculture upon the advice of a 9-member committee   HB4766- 75 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        appointed by the Governor consisting of the following 2        members: the Director of Agriculture, who shall serve 3        as chairman; 2 representatives of organization 4        licensees conducting thoroughbred race meetings in 5        this State, recommended by those licensees; 2 6        representatives of organization licensees conducting 7        standardbred race meetings in this State, recommended 8        by those licensees; a representative of the Illinois 9        Thoroughbred Breeders and Owners Foundation, 10        recommended by that Foundation; a representative of 11        the Illinois Standardbred Owners and Breeders 12        Association, recommended by that Association; a 13        representative of the Horsemen's Benevolent and 14        Protective Association or any successor organization 15        thereto established in Illinois comprised of the 16        largest number of owners and trainers, recommended by 17        that Association or that successor organization; and a 18        representative of the Illinois Harness Horsemen's 19        Association, recommended by that Association. 20        Committee members shall serve for terms of 2 years, 21        commencing January 1 of each even-numbered year. If a 22        representative of any of the above-named entities has 23        not been recommended by January 1 of any even-numbered 24        year, the Governor shall appoint a committee member to 25        fill that position. Committee members shall receive no 26        compensation for their services as members but shall   HB4766- 76 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses 2        and disbursements incurred in the performance of their 3        official duties. The remaining 50% of this 4        two-sevenths shall be distributed to county fairs for 5        premiums and rehabilitation as set forth in the 6        Agricultural Fair Act;7            Four-sevenths to park districts or municipalities 8        that do not have a park district of 500,000 population 9        or less for museum purposes (if an inter-track 10        wagering location licensee is located in such a park 11        district) or to conservation districts for museum 12        purposes (if an inter-track wagering location licensee 13        is located in a municipality that is not included 14        within any park district but is included within a 15        conservation district and is the county seat of a 16        county that (i) is contiguous to the state of Indiana 17        and (ii) has a 1990 population of 88,257 according to 18        the United States Bureau of the Census, except that if 19        the conservation district does not maintain a museum, 20        the monies shall be allocated equally between the 21        county and the municipality in which the inter-track 22        wagering location licensee is located for general 23        purposes) or to a municipal recreation board for park 24        purposes (if an inter-track wagering location licensee 25        is located in a municipality that is not included 26        within any park district and park maintenance is the   HB4766- 77 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        function of the municipal recreation board and the 2        municipality has a 1990 population of 9,302 according 3        to the United States Bureau of the Census); provided 4        that the monies are distributed to each park district 5        or conservation district or municipality that does not 6        have a park district in an amount equal to 7        four-sevenths of the amount collected by each 8        inter-track wagering location licensee within the park 9        district or conservation district or municipality for 10        the Fund. Monies that were paid into the Horse Racing 11        Tax Allocation Fund before August 9, 1991 (the 12        effective date of Public Act 87-110) by an inter-track 13        wagering location licensee located in a municipality 14        that is not included within any park district but is 15        included within a conservation district as provided in 16        this paragraph shall, as soon as practicable after 17        August 9, 1991 (the effective date of Public Act 18        87-110), be allocated and paid to that conservation 19        district as provided in this paragraph. Any park 20        district or municipality not maintaining a museum may 21        deposit the monies in the corporate fund of the park 22        district or municipality where the inter-track 23        wagering location is located, to be used for general 24        purposes; and25            One-seventh to the Agricultural Premium Fund to be 26        used for distribution to agricultural home economics   HB4766- 78 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        extension councils in accordance with "An Act in 2        relation to additional support and finances for the 3        Agricultural and Home Economic Extension Councils in 4        the several counties of this State and making an 5        appropriation therefor", approved July 24, 1967.6        Until January 1, 2000, all other monies paid into the 7    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund pursuant to this 8    paragraph (11) shall be allocated by appropriation as 9    follows:10            Two-sevenths to the Department of Agriculture. 11        Fifty percent of this two-sevenths shall be used to 12        promote the Illinois horse racing and breeding 13        industry, and shall be distributed by the Department 14        of Agriculture upon the advice of a 9-member committee 15        appointed by the Governor consisting of the following 16        members: the Director of Agriculture, who shall serve 17        as chairman; 2 representatives of organization 18        licensees conducting thoroughbred race meetings in 19        this State, recommended by those licensees; 2 20        representatives of organization licensees conducting 21        standardbred race meetings in this State, recommended 22        by those licensees; a representative of the Illinois 23        Thoroughbred Breeders and Owners Foundation, 24        recommended by that Foundation; a representative of 25        the Illinois Standardbred Owners and Breeders 26        Association, recommended by that Association; a   HB4766- 79 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        representative of the Horsemen's Benevolent and 2        Protective Association or any successor organization 3        thereto established in Illinois comprised of the 4        largest number of owners and trainers, recommended by 5        that Association or that successor organization; and a 6        representative of the Illinois Harness Horsemen's 7        Association, recommended by that Association. 8        Committee members shall serve for terms of 2 years, 9        commencing January 1 of each even-numbered year. If a 10        representative of any of the above-named entities has 11        not been recommended by January 1 of any even-numbered 12        year, the Governor shall appoint a committee member to 13        fill that position. Committee members shall receive no 14        compensation for their services as members but shall 15        be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses 16        and disbursements incurred in the performance of their 17        official duties. The remaining 50% of this 18        two-sevenths shall be distributed to county fairs for 19        premiums and rehabilitation as set forth in the 20        Agricultural Fair Act;21            Four-sevenths to museums and aquariums located in 22        park districts of over 500,000 population; provided 23        that the monies are distributed in accordance with the 24        previous year's distribution of the maintenance tax 25        for such museums and aquariums as provided in Section 26        2 of the Park District Aquarium and Museum Act; and  HB4766- 80 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1            One-seventh to the Agricultural Premium Fund to be 2        used for distribution to agricultural home economics 3        extension councils in accordance with "An Act in 4        relation to additional support and finances for the 5        Agricultural and Home Economic Extension Councils in 6        the several counties of this State and making an 7        appropriation therefor", approved July 24, 1967. This 8        subparagraph (C) shall be inoperative and of no force 9        and effect on and after January 1, 2000.10            (D) Except as provided in paragraph (11) of this 11        subsection (h), with respect to purse allocation from 12        inter-track wagering, the monies so retained shall be 13        divided as follows:14                (i) If the inter-track wagering licensee, 15            except an inter-track wagering licensee that 16            derives its license from an organization licensee 17            located in a county with a population in excess of 18            230,000 and bounded by the Mississippi River, is 19            not conducting its own race meeting during the 20            same dates, then the entire purse allocation shall 21            be to purses at the track where the races wagered 22            on are being conducted.23                (ii) If the inter-track wagering licensee, 24            except an inter-track wagering licensee that 25            derives its license from an organization licensee 26            located in a county with a population in excess of   HB4766- 81 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1            230,000 and bounded by the Mississippi River, is 2            also conducting its own race meeting during the 3            same dates, then the purse allocation shall be as 4            follows: 50% to purses at the track where the 5            races wagered on are being conducted; 50% to 6            purses at the track where the inter-track wagering 7            licensee is accepting such wagers.8                (iii) If the inter-track wagering is being 9            conducted by an inter-track wagering location 10            licensee, except an inter-track wagering location 11            licensee that derives its license from an 12            organization licensee located in a county with a 13            population in excess of 230,000 and bounded by the 14            Mississippi River, the entire purse allocation for 15            Illinois races shall be to purses at the track 16            where the race meeting being wagered on is being 17            held.18        (12) The Board shall have all powers necessary and 19    proper to fully supervise and control the conduct of 20    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering by inter-track 21    wagering licensees and inter-track wagering location 22    licensees, including, but not limited to, the following:23            (A) The Board is vested with power to promulgate 24        reasonable rules and regulations for the purpose of 25        administering the conduct of this wagering and to 26        prescribe reasonable rules, regulations and conditions   HB4766- 82 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        under which such wagering shall be held and conducted. 2        Such rules and regulations are to provide for the 3        prevention of practices detrimental to the public 4        interest and for the best interests of said wagering 5        and to impose penalties for violations thereof.6            (B) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it 7        delegates this power, is vested with the power to 8        enter the facilities of any licensee to determine 9        whether there has been compliance with the provisions 10        of this Act and the rules and regulations relating to 11        the conduct of such wagering.12            (C) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it 13        delegates this power, may eject or exclude from any 14        licensee's facilities, any person whose conduct or 15        reputation is such that his presence on such premises 16        may, in the opinion of the Board, call into the 17        question the honesty and integrity of, or interfere 18        with the orderly conduct of such wagering; provided, 19        however, that no person shall be excluded or ejected 20        from such premises solely on the grounds of race, 21        color, creed, national origin, ancestry, or sex.22            (D) (Blank).23            (E) The Board is vested with the power to appoint 24        delegates to execute any of the powers granted to it 25        under this Section for the purpose of administering 26        this wagering and any rules and regulations   HB4766- 83 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        promulgated in accordance with this Act.2            (F) The Board shall name and appoint a State 3        director of this wagering who shall be a 4        representative of the Board and whose duty it shall be 5        to supervise the conduct of inter-track wagering as 6        may be provided for by the rules and regulations of the 7        Board; such rules and regulation shall specify the 8        method of appointment and the Director's powers, 9        authority and duties. The Board may appoint the 10        Director of Mutuels to also serve as the State 11        director of this wagering. 12            (G) The Board is vested with the power to impose 13        civil penalties of up to $10,000 $5,000 against 14        individuals and up to $25,000 $10,000 against 15        licensees for each violation of any provision of this 16        Act relating to the conduct of this wagering, any 17        rules adopted by the Board, any order of the Board or 18        any other action which in the Board's discretion, is a 19        detriment or impediment to such wagering.20        (13) The Department of Agriculture may enter into 21    agreements with licensees authorizing such licensees to 22    conduct inter-track wagering on races to be held at the 23    licensed race meetings conducted by the Department of 24    Agriculture. Such agreement shall specify the races of the 25    Department of Agriculture's licensed race meeting upon 26    which the licensees will conduct wagering. In the event   HB4766- 84 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    that a licensee conducts inter-track pari-mutuel wagering 2    on races from the Illinois State Fair or DuQuoin State 3    Fair which are in addition to the licensee's previously 4    approved racing program, those races shall be considered a 5    separate racing day for the purpose of determining the 6    daily handle and computing the privilege or pari-mutuel 7    tax on that daily handle as provided in Sections 27 and 8    27.1. Such agreements shall be approved by the Board 9    before such wagering may be conducted. In determining 10    whether to grant approval, the Board shall give due 11    consideration to the best interests of the public and of 12    horse racing. The provisions of paragraphs (1), (8), 13    (8.1), and (8.2) of subsection (h) of this Section which 14    are not specified in this paragraph (13) shall not apply 15    to licensed race meetings conducted by the Department of 16    Agriculture at the Illinois State Fair in Sangamon County 17    or the DuQuoin State Fair in Perry County, or to any 18    wagering conducted on those race meetings.19        (14) An inter-track wagering location license 20    authorized by the Board in 2016 that is owned and operated 21    by a race track in Rock Island County shall be transferred 22    to a commonly owned race track in Cook County on August 12, 23    2016 (the effective date of Public Act 99-757). The 24    licensee shall retain its status in relation to purse 25    distribution under paragraph (11) of this subsection (h) 26    following the transfer to the new entity. The pari-mutuel   HB4766- 85 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    tax credit under Section 32.1 shall not be applied toward 2    any pari-mutuel tax obligation of the inter-track wagering 3    location licensee of the license that is transferred under 4    this paragraph (14).5    (i) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Act, the 6conduct of wagering at wagering facilities is authorized on 7all days, except as limited by subsection (b) of Section 19 of 8this Act.9(Source: P.A. 104-185, eff. 8-15-25.) 10    (230 ILCS 5/27.2)11    Sec. 27.2. Withholding of delinquent child support.12    (a) From winnings required to be reported to the Internal 13Revenue Service and subject to withholding on Form W-2G, 14organization licensees and advance deposit wagering licensees 15licensed under this Act shall withhold up to the full amount of 16winnings necessary to pay the winner's past due child support 17amount as certified by the Department of Healthcare and Family 18Services under Section 10-17.15 of the Illinois Public Aid 19Code. Amounts withheld shall be paid to the Department of 20Healthcare and Family Services by the organization licensee or 21the advance deposit wagering licensee, as applicable.22    (b) For withholding of winnings, the organization licensee 23or advance deposit wagering licensee shall be entitled to an 24administrative fee not to exceed the lesser of 4% of the total 25amount of cash winnings paid to the gambling winner or $150.  HB4766- 86 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    (c) In no event may the total amount withheld from the cash 2payout, including the administrative fee, exceed the total 3cash winnings claimed by the obligor. If the cash payout 4claimed is greater than the amount sufficient to satisfy the 5obligor's delinquent child support payments, the organization 6licensee or advance deposit wagering licensee shall pay the 7obligor the remaining balance of the payout, less the 8administrative fee authorized by subsection (b) of this 9Section, at the time it is claimed.10    (d) An organization licensee or an advance deposit 11wagering licensee that in good faith complies with the 12requirements of this Section shall not be liable to the gaming 13winner or any other individual or entity.14    (e) For an organization licensee under this Act, an agent 15of the Board (such as an employee of the Board) shall be 16responsible for notifying the person identified as being 17delinquent in child support payments that the organization 18licensee is required by law to withhold all or a portion of the 19person's his or her winnings. This notification must be 20provided at the time the winnings are withheld.21    (f) The provisions of this Section shall be operative on 22and after the date that rules are adopted by the Department of 23Healthcare and Family Services pursuant to Section 10-17.15 of 24the Illinois Public Aid Code.25    (g) The delinquent child support required to be withheld 26under this Section and the administrative fee under subsection   HB4766- 87 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1(b) of this Section have priority over any secured or 2unsecured claim on cash winnings, except claims for federal or 3State taxes that are required to be withheld under federal or 4State law. 5(Source: P.A. 98-318, eff. 8-12-13.) 6    (230 ILCS 5/31.1)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-31.1)7    Sec. 31.1. (a) Unless subsection (a-5) applies, 8organization licensees collectively shall contribute annually 9to charity the sum of $750,000 to non-profit organizations 10that provide medical and family, counseling, and similar 11services to persons who reside or work on the backstretch of 12Illinois racetracks. Unless subsection (a-5) applies, these 13contributions shall be collected as follows: (i) no later than 14July 1st of each year the Board shall assess each organization 15licensee, except those tracks located in Madison County, which 16tracks shall pay $30,000 annually apiece into the Board 17charity fund, that amount which equals $750,000 $690,000 18multiplied by the amount of pari-mutuel wagering handled by 19the organization licensee in the year preceding assessment and 20divided by the total pari-mutuel wagering handled by all 21Illinois organization licensees, except those tracks located 22in Madison and Rock Island counties, in the year preceding 23assessment; (ii) notice of the assessed contribution shall be 24mailed to each organization licensee; (iii) no later than 25September 1st of each year within thirty days of its receipt of   HB4766- 88 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1such notice, each organization licensee shall remit the 2assessed contribution to the Board. Unless subsection (a-5) 3applies, if an organization licensee commences operation of 4gaming at its facility pursuant to an organization gaming 5license under the Illinois Gambling Act, then the organization 6licensee shall contribute an additional $83,000 per year 7beginning in the year subsequent to the first year in which the 8organization licensee begins receiving funds from gaming 9pursuant to an organization gaming license. If an organization 10licensee willfully wilfully fails to so remit the 11contribution, the Board may revoke its license to conduct 12horse racing.13    (a-5) If (1) an organization licensee that did not operate 14live racing in 2017 is awarded racing dates in 2018 or in any 15subsequent year and (2) all organization licensees are 16operating gaming pursuant to an organization gaming license 17under the Illinois Gambling Act, then subsection (a) does not 18apply and organization licensees collectively shall contribute 19annually to charity the sum of $1,000,000 to non-profit 20organizations that provide medical and family, counseling, and 21similar services to persons who reside or work on the 22backstretch of Illinois racetracks. These contributions shall 23be collected as follows: (i) no later than July 1st of each 24year the Board shall assess each organization licensee an 25amount based on the proportionate amount of live racing days 26in the calendar year for which the Board has awarded to the   HB4766- 89 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1organization licensee out of the total aggregate number of 2live racing days awarded; (ii) notice of the assessed 3contribution shall be mailed to each organization licensee; 4(iii) no later than September 1st of each year within 30 days 5after its receipt of such notice, each organization licensee 6shall remit the assessed contribution to the Board. If an 7organization licensee willfully fails to so remit the 8contribution, the Board may revoke its license to conduct 9horse racing. 10    (b) No later than October 1st of each year, any qualified 11charitable organization seeking an allotment of contributed 12funds shall submit to the Board an application for those 13funds, using the Board's approved form. The Board shall 14distribute all such amounts collected that year to such 15charitable organization applicants on a schedule determined by 16the Board, based on the charitable organization's estimated 17expenditures related to this grant. Any funds not expended by 18the grantee in a grant year shall be distributed to the 19charitable organization or charitable organizations selected 20in the next grant year after the funds are recovered in 21addition to the amounts specified in subsections (a) and 22(a-5). 23(Source: P.A. 104-185, eff. 8-15-25.) 24    (230 ILCS 5/40)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-40)25    Sec. 40. (a) The imposition of any fine or penalty   HB4766- 90 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1provided in this Act shall not preclude the Board in its rules 2and regulations from imposing a fine or penalty for any other 3action which, in the Board's discretion, is a detriment or 4impediment to horse racing.5    (b) The Director of Agriculture or the Director's his or 6her authorized representative shall impose the following 7monetary penalties and hold administrative hearings as 8required for failure to submit the following applications, 9lists, or reports within the time period, date or manner 10required by statute or rule or for removing a foal from 11Illinois prior to inspection:12        (1) late filing of a renewal application for offering 13    or standing stallion for service:14            (A) if an application is submitted no more than 30 15        days late, $50;16            (B) if an application is submitted no more than 45 17        days late, $150; or18            (C) if an application is submitted more than 45 19        days late, if filing of the application is allowed 20        under an administrative hearing, $250;21        (2) late filing of list or report of mares bred:22            (A) if a list or report is submitted no more than 23        30 days late, $50;24            (B) if a list or report is submitted no more than 25        60 days late, $150; or26            (C) if a list or report is submitted more than 60   HB4766- 91 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1        days late, if filing of the list or report is allowed 2        under an administrative hearing, $250;3        (3) filing an Illinois foaled thoroughbred mare status 4    report after the statutory deadline as provided in 5    subsection (k) of Section 30 of this Act:6            (A) if a report is submitted no more than 30 days 7        late, $50;8            (B) if a report is submitted no more than 90 days 9        late, $150;10            (C) if a report is submitted no more than 150 days 11        late, $250; or12            (D) if a report is submitted more than 150 days 13        late, if filing of the report is allowed under an 14        administrative hearing, $500;15        (4) late filing of application for foal eligibility 16    certificate:17            (A) if an application is submitted no more than 30 18        days late, $50;19            (B) if an application is submitted no more than 90 20        days late, $150;21            (C) if an application is submitted no more than 22        150 days late, $250; or23            (D) if an application is submitted more than 150 24        days late, if filing of the application is allowed 25        under an administrative hearing, $500;26        (5) failure to report the intent to remove a foal from   HB4766- 92 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1    Illinois prior to inspection, identification and 2    certification by a Department of Agriculture investigator, 3    $50; and4        (6) if a list or report of mares bred is incomplete, 5    $50 per mare not included on the list or report.6    Any person upon whom monetary penalties are imposed under 7this Section 3 times within a 5-year period shall have any 8further monetary penalties imposed at double the amounts set 9forth above. All monies assessed and collected for violations 10relating to thoroughbreds shall be paid into the Illinois 11Thoroughbred Breeders Fund. All monies assessed and collected 12for violations relating to standardbreds shall be paid into 13the Illinois Standardbred Breeders Fund.14(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17; 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.  HB4766- 93 -LRB104 17812 LNS 31245 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    230 ILCS 5/6from Ch. 8, par. 37-64    230 ILCS 5/9from Ch. 8, par. 37-95    230 ILCS 5/10from Ch. 8, par. 37-106    230 ILCS 5/12from Ch. 8, par. 37-127    230 ILCS 5/13from Ch. 8, par. 37-138    230 ILCS 5/14from Ch. 8, par. 37-149    230 ILCS 5/15from Ch. 8, par. 37-1510    230 ILCS 5/15.3from Ch. 8, par. 37-15.311    230 ILCS 5/16from Ch. 8, par. 37-1612    230 ILCS 5/19from Ch. 8, par. 37-1913    230 ILCS 5/20from Ch. 8, par. 37-2014    230 ILCS 5/24from Ch. 8, par. 37-2415    230 ILCS 5/26from Ch. 8, par. 37-2616    230 ILCS 5/27.217    230 ILCS 5/31.1from Ch. 8, par. 37-31.118    230 ILCS 5/40from Ch. 8, par. 37-40